 “We now have 4-month-old mice that had diabetes and now don’t have it anymore,” he added.
 Dr. Ehud Ur, professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Canadian Diabetes Association's Clinical and Scientific Affairs Department, cautioned that the research is still in its infancy.
 Like some other experts, he was skeptical about whether it was possible to cure diabetes, and pointed out that the findings were not relevant to people who already had type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, Permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy's Literature Prize Committee, announced on Sveriges Radio in Sweden that the committee had stopped its efforts to inform Bob Dylan about his honor with the Literature Prize for Literature, after it was not possible to reach him personally.
 Danius said: "At the moment we are not doing anything. I have called his closest collaborator and sent him emails and very friendly answers. That is enough for the moment."
 Rings CEO Jamie Siminoff once said that he founded the company after he couldn't hear his doorbell from his garage workshop.
 He said he had built a WLAN doorbell.
 Siminoff said sales surged after his appearance on a 2013 episode of “Shark Tank,” even though the show’s panel of investors rejected his startup’s funding.
 In late 2017, Siminoff appeared on the QVC shopping channel.
 Ring has also settled a lawsuit with the competing security firm ADT Corporation.
 While an experimental vaccine appears to be able to reduce Ebola mortality, there are no drugs that have been proven to be clearly suitable for treating existing infections.
 An antibody cocktail, ZMapp, initially looked promising, but formal studies showed that it had less benefit than hoped in preventing deaths.
 In the PALM study, ZMapp served as a control, meaning the scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatments to it.
 USA Gymnastics supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and accepts it as an absolute necessity that the Olympic family advocate for a safe environment for all our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC that the best interests of our athletes and clubs and their sport are served by making meaningful changes within our organization, rather than decertification.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could bring to light how abuse on the scale described by the survivors of Larry Nassar could have gone undetected for so long, and welcomes all necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC have the same goal - to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for athletes so they can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and empowered environment.
 During the 1960s, Brzezinski worked as an advisor to John F. Kennedy and then for the government around Lyndon B. Johnson.
 During the 1976 election, he advised Carter on foreign policy and then served from 1977 to 1981 as National Security Advisor (NSA) in succession to Henry Kissinger.
 As national security advisor, he assisted Carter in the diplomatic handling of world affairs such as the 1978 Camp David Accords, the normalization of relations between the United States and China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution, which led to the Iran hostage crisis, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone has received nominations in all the main categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress, respectively.
 Further nominations are for example for the best film, the direction, the camera work, the costume design, the editing, the original film music, the production design, the sound editing, the sound mixing and the original script.
 Two songs from the movie, Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars, received nominations for Best Original Song. Lionsgate Studio received 26 nominations – more than any other film studio.
 Late Sunday, US President Donald Trump announced in a statement read by the press secretary that US troops would leave Syria.
 The announcement came after a telephone conversation between Trump and Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would carry out the monitoring of captured ISIS fighters, whose repatriation, the statement said, was rejected by European countries.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that is already widespread, but also provides details that fossils in general cannot provide, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists say that the feathers of this bird were brownish-brown on the upper side and light or carotenoid-colored on the underside.
 The find also provides insights into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Because dinosaur feathers lack a well-developed shaft, called the rachis, but have other features of feathers – barbs and barbules – the researchers concluded that the rachis was probably a later evolutionary development than these other features.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flying, but rather for temperature regulation or for displaying. The researchers suspected that the sample, although it is the tail of a young dinosaur, shows the plumage of an adult and not the down of a chick.
 The researchers claimed that although this is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample shows the feathers of an adult and not chick feathers.
 A car bomb exploded this morning in the police headquarters of the Turkish city of Gaziantep, killing two police officers and injuring more than twenty people.
 According to the governor's office, 19 of the injured are police officers.
 Police said they suspected a militant supporter of Daesh (ISIL) was behind the attack.
 They have found that the sun operates on the same basic principles as other stars: It has been found that the activity of all stars in the system is driven by their luminosity, rotation and nothing else.
 To determine the Rossby number of a star, which is related to the plasma flow, the luminosity and the rotation are jointly included.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is in terms of reversals of the magnetic field.
 During the journey, Iwasaki got into trouble on many occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a marriage in Nepal and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard runs on the frequencies 2,4 Ghz and 5,0 Ghz.
 This allows it to be backward compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided the base station has Dual-Radio.
 The speed of 802.11 n is much faster than that of its predecessors, which had a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duvall, married with two grown children, has not made a big impression on Miller, who was told the story.
 When asked for a comment, Miller said: "Mike talks a lot during the hearing... I was prepared and could not really hear what he said."
 "We will strive to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020 compared with the level of 2005," Hu said.
 He did not give a figure for the cuts, but said they would be made on the basis of China's economic performance.
 Hu encouraged developing countries to "avoid the old path of first polluting and then cleaning up".
 He added that “they should not, however, be asked to make commitments that go beyond their level of development, responsibility and capacity”.
 The Iraq Study Group presented its report today at 12:00 GMT.
 He warns that no one can guarantee that any course of action in Iraq at this time will stop sectarian warfare, growing violence or a slide into chaos.
 The report begins with a call for an open discussion and consensus-building in the US on a strategy for the Middle East.
 The report is highly critical of almost every aspect of the current executive policy towards Iraq and urges an immediate change of direction.
 The first of the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of this year to secure Iraq's borders against hostile intervention and to restore diplomatic relations with its neighbors.
 The current senator and Argentine first lady Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner announced her candidacy for president last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires.
 Mrs Kirchner announced her intention to run for president at the Argentine Theatre, where she also began her 2005 campaign for the Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 "The debate was sparked by a controversy over spending for hurricane relief and reconstruction in New Orleans, which some fiscal conservatives have jokingly referred to as "Bush's New Orleans deal."
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction process has focused on the fact that reconstruction contracts were awarded to alleged insiders in Washington.
 More than four million people came to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of participants was so large that it was not possible for all to gain access to the burial on St. Peter's Square.
 Several large television screens were set up in various locations in Rome so that people could watch the ceremony.
 In many other cities in Italy and the rest of the world, especially in Poland, similar facilities were installed, which were seen by many people.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's earlier policy of focusing its resources on easily solved cases, particularly car thefts, in an effort to boost the agency's success rate.
 Congress began funding the anti-obscenity initiative in August 2005, and stipulated that the FBI must employ 10 agents for adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest innings score, 70 runs off 41 balls, by hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The middle order batsmen, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, showed good form and put on a partnership of 100 runs.
 But after losing the Captain's gate, India scored only 36 runs and lost 7 wickets, which ended the innings.
 US President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16 and began a one-week trip through Asia.
 He was welcomed by Wong Kan Seng, Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister, and spoke with Lee Hsien Loong, Singapore's Prime Minister, about trade and terrorism issues.
 After a week of losses in the midterm election, Bush told the audience about expanding trade in Asia.
 "Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed after a 25-minute meeting with NDP Leader Jack Layton on Tuesday in the PMO to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee of all parties for review before the second reading."
 Layton had demanded changes to the Conservative government's environmental legislation at the meeting with the Prime Minister, and called for a "thorough and complete re-write" of the Conservative Party's environmental legislation.
 After the federal government stepped in to fund the Mersey Hospital in Devonport (Tasmania), the state government and some parliamentarians have criticized the move as a PR stunt ahead of the federal election scheduled for November.
 Prime Minister John Howard said, however, that the measure to provide A$45 million was only to keep the hospital facilities from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government.
 According to the latest bulletin, the sea level measurements indicated that a tsunami was triggered. Near Pago Pago and Niue, a clear tsunami activity was recorded.
 No significant damage or injuries were reported from Tonga, but power was out in some areas, which was reportedly the reason the Tongan authorities did not receive the PTWC tsunami warning.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii that are on or near the coast were closed all day Wednesday, even though the warnings had been lifted.
 U.S. President George W. Bush welcomed the announcement.
 "Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe called North Korea's pledge "an important step toward the goal of verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.""
 The tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, subtropical storm Jerry, has formed in the Atlantic Ocean today.
 The National Hurricane Center (NHC) says that Jerry is not a threat to land at this time.
 The US Army Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain could cause the already damaged dams to break.
 The Ninth Ward, which was flooded up to 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina, is currently experiencing high water levels as the nearby levee has been breached.
 On a 100 foot long section, water runs over the dam.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his disappointment about the distances when he spoke with Wikinews last month.
 "He [Wales] basically lied to us from the beginning. Firstly, by pretending that this was for legal reasons. Secondly, by pretending that he was listening to us, right up to his artistic deletion."
 The community's irritation led to the current efforts to draft a policy on sexual content for the website, which hosts millions of open-licensed media.
 The work was mostly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations made by the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect the team was looking for would be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky Way.
 Just as the Moon pulls the Earth and causes tides, the Milky Way also exerts gravitational forces on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The scientists concluded that dark matter acts on other dark matter in the same way as normal matter.
 This theory states that most of the dark matter is in a kind of halo around a galaxy and is made up of many small particles.
 Television reports show white smoke coming from the plant.
 Local authorities are urging residents near the plant to stay indoors, turn off air conditioners and not drink tap water.
 According to Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority, radioactive cesium and iodine were detected at the nuclear power plant.
 Authorities speculate that this indicates that containers with uranium fuel at the site could have been torn and possibly leaking.
 Extremely drug-resistant tuberculosis (XDR-TB) was discovered by Dr. Tony Moll in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal.
 "In an interview, he said the new variant was "extremely worrying and alarming because of the very high mortality rate.""
 Some patients may have picked up the bug in hospital, Dr Moll said, and at least two were medical staff.
 Within one year, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Nevertheless, the proportion of XDR-TB in the total group of people with tuberculosis is apparently still low; 6,000 of the total 330,000 people who are infected at a given time in South Africa.
 The satellites, which both weighed more than 1,000 pounds, collided 491 miles above the Earth at an approximate speed of 17,500 miles per hour.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was violent.
 They are still trying to figure out how extensive the collision was and how the Earth will be affected.
 The Strategic Command of the United States Department of Defense is finding the wreckage.
 The result of the plotting analysis is published on a public website.
 A doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, is charged with murder after her dead mother was found in the trunk of her car on Wednesday in Ohio, authorities said.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found lying on the ground beside the road in T-shirt and underwear, apparently under the influence of strong medication, in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati.
 She led the officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There, the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, was found under blood-stained blankets.
 Police said the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease this season were reported at the end of July.
 The disease is transmitted by pigs and then moves through mosquitoes to humans.
 The outbreak prompted the Indian government to hire pig catchers in heavily affected areas, distribute thousands of mosquito nets and spray pesticides.
 The government has also promised several million bottles of vaccine against meningitis, which will help to equip health departments for next year.
 Plans for vaccines that were to be delivered to the historically hardest-hit areas this year were delayed due to lack of funding and low priority setting compared to other diseases.
 In 1956 Słania went to Sweden, where he started working in the Swedish Post Office three years later and became the head engraver.
 He produced over 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 The quality and precision of his work are so highly regarded that his name is one of the very few generally known names in the field of philately, and some collectors specialize exclusively in his work.
 His one thousandth stamp, from the year 2000,  shows the magnificent painting "Glorious Deeds of Swedish Kings" by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl and is listed in the Guinness Book of Records.
 He was also involved in the design of banknotes for many countries, and current examples of his work include the portraits of the Prime Ministers on the front of the Canadian $5 and $100 notes.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to a hospital, but he died shortly thereafter.
 The truck driver, who is 64 years old, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident at approximately 12:00 GMT on the same day.
 A person who worked in a workshop near the accident site said: "There were children waiting to cross the road, and everyone was screaming and crying."
 They all ran back from the accident site.
 Other topics on the agenda in Bali are saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in less environmentally damaging ways.
 The United Nations also hopes to be able to set up a fund to help countries affected by global warming to cope with the effects.
 The funds could be used for flood-proof houses, better water management and crop diversification.
 Fluke wrote that the efforts of some, women who wanted to speak about women's health, to be over-ridden, were not successful.
 She came to this conclusion because of the numerous positive comments and encouragement she received from both men and women who urged that contraceptives be considered a medical necessity.
 When the fighting stopped after the transport of the wounded to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining inmates remained on the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 The negotiators tried to defuse the situation, but the demands of the prisoners are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 11:00 MDT, a fire was set by the inmates in the courtyard.
 Soon, police officers equipped with riot gear entered the premises and pushed the inmates into a corner with tear gas.
 The fire department was able to extinguish the fire at 23:35.
 After the dam was built in 1963, the seasonal floods that distribute sediments in the river came to a halt.
 This sediment was necessary to form sandbars and beaches that served as habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two fish species have become extinct and two more are threatened with extinction, including the Gila cypha.
 Officials hope the rise in water levels after the flood is enough to restore eroded sandbars downstream, although it is only a few feet.
 No tsunami warning was issued and according to the Jakarta Geophysics Agency, there will be no tsunami warning as the earthquake did not reach the required magnitude of 6.5.
 Although there was no tsunami threat, the residents panicked and began to leave their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey shed tears at her farewell, she assured her fans that she would be back.
 "This will not be a farewell. This is the end of a chapter and the beginning of a new chapter."
 The final results of the Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections have indicated that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba was re-elected by a wide margin.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organisation (SWAPO), retained a majority in the parliamentary elections.
 Coalition and Afghan forces moved into the area to secure the site, and other coalition aircraft were dispatched to provide support.
 The crash occurred high up in mountainous terrain, and it is suspected that it was the result of enemy fire.
 The search for the crash site is hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 The medical welfare association Mangola, Medecines Sans Frontieres and the World Health Organization declare that this is the worst outbreak recorded in the country.
 "Richard Veerman, spokesman for Doctors Without Borders, said: "Angola is heading for the worst outbreak ever, and the situation in Angola is still very bad.""
 The games started at 10:00 am in great weather and apart from some drizzle in the morning, which soon cleared, it was an ideal day for 7s rugby.
 South Africa, the top-ranked team in the tournament, started with a comfortable 26–00 win against Zambia, the fifth-ranked team.
 Although the team in the game against their southern sisters definitely looked rusty, South Africa improved steadily throughout the tournament.
 Their disciplined defense, ball control and excellent teamwork made it clear that this was the team that had to be beaten.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank Museum say the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a public health risk because it could fall at any time.
 It was due to be passed on Tuesday, but was saved by an emergency court ruling.
 All the cave entrances, also called "The Seven Sisters", have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters (328 to 820 feet).
 Infrared images show temperature differences between night and day, which indicate that these are probably caves.
 """They are colder than the surrounding surface during the day and warmer at night."
 "Their thermal behavior is not as uniform as that of large caves on Earth, which often have a fairly constant temperature, but it does match that of deep holes in the ground," said Glen Cushing of the Astrogeology Team of the United States Geological Survey (USGS) and Northern Arizona University in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech experience: Voters isolate themselves in a booth and put a pre-printed sheet of paper, on which the candidate of their choice is written, into an envelope.
 After the officials have confirmed the identity of the voter, the voter throws the envelope into the ballot box and signs the voter list.
 The French electoral law lays down the procedure quite strictly.
 Since 1988, ballot boxes have had to be transparent so that voters and observers can verify that no envelopes are present at the start of the vote and that no envelopes are added except those of the properly counted and authorized voters.
 The candidates can send representatives to witness every part of the process, and the votes are counted by volunteers under strict supervision and special procedures.
 The ASUS Eee PC, previously marketed worldwide on the basis of saving and functionality factors, became a hot topic at the Taipei IT Month 2007.
 But the consumer market for laptop computers will radically change after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award 2007 by Manager Yuan from the Republic of China.
 The station’s website describes the show as “Old-school radio theater with a new and eerie twist!”
 In its early days, the show was only shown on the veteran internet radio site TogiNet Radio, a site that focuses on talk radio.
 At the end of 2015 TogiNet founded the subsidiary AstroNet Radio.
 The show originally had local amateur voice actors from East Texas.
 Reports said that extensive looting continued through the night, while police officers showed no presence on the streets of Bishkek.
 "According to one observer, Bishkek was descending into a state of 'anarchy' as gangs of people roamed the streets and looted consumer goods stores."
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the demonstrators from the south for the lawlessness.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks (New Zealand) in a rugby union match in the Tri Nations tournament at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in South Africa's Rustenburg.
 The final score was a win by one point, 21 to 20, which ended the All Blacks' winning streak of 15 games.
 The Springboks ended a five-game losing streak.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final of the tournament will be held next week at the Ellis Park Stadium in Johannesburg, where the Springboks will face Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook western Montana at 10:08 p.m. Monday.
 No immediate reports of damage were received by the United States Geological Survey (USGS) and its National Earthquake Information Center.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was about 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 It has been confirmed that the deadly bird flu H5N1 infected a wild duck that was found dead on Monday in a marsh area near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh country of the European Union to be affected by the virus; after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Suspected cases of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for "widespread death, destruction and terrorization of many millions of earthlings."
 Chambers, an agnostic, argues that his lawsuit is "frivolous" and that "anyone can sue anyone".
 The story, which was presented in the French opera by Camille Saint-Saens, is about an artist, "whose life is determined by the love of drugs and Japan".
 So the actors on stage smoke cannabis joints and the theater itself encourages the audience to join in.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Governor Rick Perry and Congresswoman Michele Bachmann each finished fourth, fifth and sixth.
 After the results were in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but had harsh words for Romney, whose campaign had run negative ads against Gingrich in Iowa.
 "Perry said he would "return to Texas to evaluate the results of tonight's primary and decide whether there is a path forward for me in this race," but later said he would stay in the race and compete in the South Carolina primary on Jan. 21."
 Bachmann, who won the Ames straw poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he subsequently died.
 He was reportedly in his 20s. In a statement, Bieber said, "Although I was not present at this tragic accident nor was I directly involved in it, my thoughts and prayers are with the victim's family."
 The entertainment news website TMZ has learned that the photographer pulled over on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to take photos of the police stop before he crossed the street and continued on his way, which prompted the California Highway Patrol officer conducting the traffic stop to order him back across the street twice.
 According to the police, the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will probably not be charged.
 Since only eighteen medals are available per day, a number of countries have not made it to the podium.
 These include the Netherlands, where Anna Jochemsen placed ninth in the women's super-G standings yesterday, and Finland with Katja Saarinen, who placed tenth in the same competition.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley was eleventh in the standing Super-G of the men. The Czech competitor Oldrich Jelinek was sixteenth in the sitting Super-G of the men.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez came in fifteenth place in the men's Super-G (seated). The New Zealander Adam Hall came in ninth place in the men's Super-G (standing).
 The visually impaired Polish skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished 13th in the Super-G. South Korean skier Jong Seork Park finished 24th in the men's Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are blamed for the outbreak of the disease, which broke out near the troops' camp.
 According to the complaint, the waste from the UN camp was not properly cleaned, which led to bacteria entering the Artibonit River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the troops arrived, there had been no problems in Haiti related to the disease since the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy has cited independent studies that suggest the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion unwittingly brought the disease to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was likely caused by the Blue Helmets.
 Hamilton confirmed that the Howard University Hospital has admitted the patient in stable condition.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where some cases of Ebola virus occurred.
 The hospital followed infection control protocols, including separating the patient from others to prevent infection of others.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon had worked on several shows in various capacities.
 In the 1980s, he worked on shows like "Taxi", "Cheers" and "The Tracey Ullman Show".
 In 1989, he helped Brooks and Groening create The Simpsons and was responsible for hiring the show's first writing staff.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive licensing fees in the double-digit millions each season.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported the planned hijacking of an aircraft.
 Later reports said the plane had received a bomb threat and was diverted to Afghanistan, where it landed in Kandahar.
 Early reports say the plane was diverted back to Afghanistan after it was denied permission to land in Urumqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, which has an outdated fleet that is poorly maintained for both civilian and military use.
 International sanctions have meant that no new aircraft can be bought.
 Three people were killed and three others injured in a helicopter crash earlier this week.
 Last month Iran suffered its worst air disaster in years when a passenger plane crashed on its way to Armenia, killing all 168 passengers.
 In the same month, another passenger plane overshot the end of a runway in Mashhad and collided with a wall, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith have canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The rock band was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 After lead singer Steven Tyler injured himself during a fall from the stage on August 5, they canceled the tour.
 Murray lost the first set in the tiebreak, after both men had held every single serve in the set.
 Del Potro had an early lead in the second set, but again a tie break was required after the 6:6 was reached.
 Potros shoulder has been treated in the meantime, but he was able to return to the field.
 The program began at 20:30 local time (15:00 UTC).
 Famous singers from all over the country presented Bhajans, devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 Singer Sanju Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan, accompanied by singer Raju Khandelwal.
 Then Lakkha Singh took over the leadership in singing the Bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was served 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (in Hinduism 56 different edible things like sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes etc. which are offered to the God)
 Lakkha Singh also presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan. The singer Raju Khandelwal accompanied him.
 At the Tokyo Game Show keynote presentation on Thursday, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata revealed the controller design for the company's new Nintendo Revolution console.
 Similar to a TV remote control, the controller uses two sensors that are placed near the user's television to triangulate the user's position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in video games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and had to retire from the race shortly after the start.
 His teammate led the race most of the time, but ended it right after his pit stop, probably because of a badly jammed right front tire.
 Shortly after Alonso, Michael also ended his race due to damage to the suspension from the numerous battles during the race.
 "She's very sweet and she sings pretty well," he said, according to a transcript of the news conference.
 "I was moved to the core by every rehearsal for this."
 About 3 minutes after takeoff, a camera showed numerous pieces of insulating foam detaching from the fuel tank.
 However, it is not believed that they damaged the shuttle in any way.
 N. Wayne Hale Jr., head of NASA's shuttle program, said the foam "fell off after the time we were concerned about."
 After five minutes the wind comes up, about a minute later the wind reaches 70 km/h... Then it starts to rain, but the drops are so hard and big that they sting the skin. Then hail fell from the sky, people panicked, screamed and ran to each other.
 "I lost my sister and her friend, and on my way there were two disabled people in wheelchairs, over which people just jumped and pushed them," said Armand Versace.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported that the earthquake had no effect and that the reactors No. 1 and 2 of the Shika nuclear power plant had been shut down.
 It is reported that about 9,400 homes in the region have no water and about 100 have no electricity.
 Some roads were damaged and rail traffic in the affected areas was suspended. Noto Airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb exploded in front of the Governor-General's office building.
 Three more bombs exploded within two hours near government buildings.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight and official reports confirm that up to 30 people were injured, but no final figures are available yet.
 Both cyanuric acid and melamine were found in urine samples from pets that died after consuming contaminated pet food.
 The two compounds react with each other and form crystals that, according to the researchers of the university, can impair the kidney function.
 The researchers discovered crystals in the cat urine that had formed through the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 The composition of these crystals corresponds to the composition found in the urine of affected pets when compared by means of infrared spectroscopy (FTIR).
 I don't know if you knew this, but most of the goods from Central America came into our country duty-free.
 Nevertheless, eighty percent of our goods were taxed in Central American countries. We take care of you.
 That didn't seem right to me; it was certainly not fair.
 I just tell people that we want to be treated the same way we treat others.
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill that bans the sale or rental of video games that contain violence to minors.
 The bill would require video games sold in California to be labeled with a "18" rating and would impose a $1,000 fine for selling games to minors.
 The Director of Public Prosecutions, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning announcing that both Huhne and Pryce would be prosecuted.
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in the cabinet by MP Ed Davey. It is expected that MP Norman Lamb will take over the job of Economic Secretary to the Treasury, which Davey is just leaving.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear at Westminster Magistrates Court on February 16.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered wounds to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required reconstructive surgery to his face.
 Uka's gun had a safety when he aimed it at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has since suffered chronic pain, lost sight in one eye, and has a part of his skull missing. His face had to be reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider said via a video link from a USAF base in his home country.
 In addition to the Wednesday event, Carpanedo competed in two individual races at the championship.
 Their first event was the slalom, in which they received a "did not finish" in their first run. 36 of the 116 competitors achieved the same result in this race.
 Her other race, the giant slalom, she finished in 10th place in the women's group with a combined time of 4:41.30. This was 2:11.60 minutes slower than the first-placed Austrian Claudia Lösch and 1:09.02 minutes faster than the ninth-placed Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani.
 Four skiers of the Krückenskifahren did not reach the finish line, and 45 of the total 117 skiers in the giant slalom could not place themselves in the race.
 The police of Madhya Pradesh have found the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 Deputy Inspector General D. K. Arya said: "We have arrested five persons who raped the Swiss woman and seized her mobile phone and laptop."
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanja, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Police chief Chandra Shekhar Solanki said the accused had appeared in court with their faces covered.
 Although three people were in the house when the car crashed in, none of them were injured.
 The driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially taken to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was subsequently transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya has since been charged with murdering her son at Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She is in custody until the charges are filed and the trial begins, but witness statements could be tainted because her image has been widely published.
 This is common practice elsewhere in Britain, but the Scottish justice system works differently, and the courts have deemed the publication of the photos as potentially damaging.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee notes: "Journalists seem to be crossing a dangerous line when they publish photos etc. of suspects."
 The Crown Office, which is leading the prosecution, has indicated to journalists that no further comment will be made until the charges are laid.
 According to the Leak, the document refers to the border dispute, in which the Palestinians demand a return to the borders in the state before the Six-Day War of 1967.
 Other topics that are supposedly covered include the future of Jerusalem, which is holy to both nations, and the problem of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a military presence in the Jordan Valley for 10 years after the signing of the agreement, while the Palestinian Authority wants such a presence only for five years.
 The guards of the accompanying trial to control the plague should be closely supervised by riders, as the trial was monitored and its effectiveness evaluated.
 As part of a partnership between NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc., qualified volunteers were recruited as part of the Sporting Shooters Association’s Hunting Program.
 According to Mick O’Flynn, the managing director of Park Conservation and Heritage in the NPWS, the four hunters selected for the first hunting operation received comprehensive safety and training.
 Martelly yesterday swore in a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) with nine members.
 It is Martelly's fifth CEP within four years.
 Last month, a presidential commission recommended the resignation of the previous CEP as part of a package of measures to steer the country towards new elections.
 The commission was Martelly's response to widespread regime-critical protests that began in October.
 The trigger for the sometimes violent protests was the failure to hold elections, some of which have been pending since 2011.
 Over 60 cases of overheating have been reported in defective iPods, resulting in six fires and four minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it had been notified of 27 accidents involving the devices.
 "Last week, METI announced that it had been informed by Apple of 34 additional cases of overheating, which the company described as "not serious."
 The ministry responded by calling the delay in the report by Apple as "really regrettable".
 The earthquake struck Mariana at 07:19 local time (21:19 GMT on Friday).
 The Northern Marianas Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Management said no damage was reported in the country.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said there was no indication of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine policeman took tourists from Hong Kong hostage by hijacking their bus in Manila, the capital of the Philippines.
 Rolando Mendoza shot the tourists with his M16 rifle.
 Several hostages have been rescued and there are at least six confirmed deaths.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released early, as were the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers took the place of an elderly lady when she had to go to the toilet. Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and pursued a medical career.
 He trained as a midwife and took up his work in the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 While working in the hospital, Liggins began to study premature labor in his spare time.
 His research showed that the application of a hormone accelerated the lung maturation of the fetus.
 Xinhua reported that government investigators on Wednesday recovered two "black box" flight recorders.
 Wrestling colleagues also paid tribute to Luna.
 "Tommy Dreamer said: ""Luna was the first Queen of Extreme. My first manager. Luna died on the night of the two moons. Very unique, just like her. A strong woman."""
 Dustin "Goldust" Runnels commented, "Luna was as crazy as I was... maybe even crazier... I love her and will miss her... hopefully she's in a better place."
 Of the 1,400 people surveyed before the 2010 federal elections, the proportion of those who oppose Australia becoming a republic has increased by 8 per cent since 2008.
 The acting Prime Minister Julia Gillard declared during the election campaign for the federal election in 2010 that she thought Australia should become a republic at the end of the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 34 percent of respondents share this view and want Elizabeth II to be the last Australian monarch.
 29 percent of respondents said Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, while 31 percent said Australia should never become a republic.
 The Olympic gold medalist was supposed to swim in the Commonwealth Games in the disciplines 100 m and 200 m freestyle and in three relay races, but because of his many complaints his fitness was questioned.
 He was not able to take the required medication to overcome his pain, as they are banned at the Commonwealth Games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number.
 Numerous people confirmed the discovery using different hardware and software in early February and it was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets may have been a source of water for the Earth, along with organic matter that can form proteins and enable life.
 Since comets collided with the Earth long ago, scientists hope to gain insights into how planets, especially the Earth, formed.
 Cuomo (53) took office earlier this year and last month signed a bill legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He described the rumors as "political chatter and nonsense."
 It is speculated that he could run for the office of President in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that the FAA claims would allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel and reduce carbon emissions each year.
 It relies on satellite-based technology instead of the older ground-based radar technology to enable air traffic controllers to more accurately locate aircraft and provide pilots with more accurate information.
 No additional transport is being put in place and the overground trains will not be stopping at Wembley. There are no car parks or park and ride facilities available on site.
 With the concern over lack of transportation, the possibility grew that the game would have to be played behind closed doors without the fans of the team.
 A study published Thursday in the journal Science reported the emergence of a new bird species on the Ecuadorian Galápagos Islands.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden reported that the new species had developed within only two generations, whereas it was previously thought that this process would take much longer due to the mating between a native Darwin finch, Geospiza fortes, and the introduced cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be processed into various forms. It can be rolled into tiny shapes.
 It can be drawn into a thin wire that can be twisted and braided. It can be hammered or rolled into sheets.
 It can be made very thin and glued to other metal. It can be made so thin that it was sometimes used to decorate hand-painted pictures, called illuminated manuscripts, in books, which are called illuminated manuscripts.
 This is called the pH value of a chemical. One can make an indicator with red cabbage juice.
 The cabbage juice changes its color depending on how acidic or basic (alkaline) the chemical is.
 The pH level indicates the amount of hydrogen ions (the H in pH) in the tested chemicals.
 Hydrogen ions are protons that have lost their electrons (since hydrogen atoms consist of a proton and an electron).
 Mix the two dry powders together and then shape them with clean, wet hands into a ball.
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers, which feels weird and forms a kind of protective layer.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had flush toilets in almost every house, connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 Remains of sewage systems were found in the houses of the Minoan cities on Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 Toilets were also used in ancient Egypt, Persia and China. In Roman culture, toilets were sometimes part of public baths, which men and women visited in mixed company.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and then reflects it almost immediately back down to Earth.
 The satellite was launched into space by a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space because the Earth's atmosphere distorts our light and our view a little.
 It takes a gigantic rocket with a height of more than 100 feet to shoot a satellite or a telescope into space.
 The wheel has changed the world in an incredible way. The greatest service that the wheel has rendered to us is much easier and faster transport.
 It has brought us the railroad, the automobile, and many other means of transportation.
 Among them are medium-sized cats that eat medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small cats (including free-roaming domestic cats) that eat much smaller prey such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of the niche, a special task that each cat has and that ensures that it does not compete with others.
 Lions are the most social cats. They live in large groups called prides.
 The packs consist of one to three related adult males and up to thirty females and young.
 Women usually have a close relationship with each other when they live in a large family with sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides behave similarly to wolf or dog packs, animals that are surprisingly similar in behavior to lions (but not other big cats) and are just as deadly to their prey.
 As a versatile athlete, the tiger can climb (though not very well), swim, jump great distances, and pull with the force of five times a strong man.
 The tiger is in the same group (genus Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars, and is the only one of these four cats that can roar.
 The roar of the tiger does not sound like the full-throated roar of the lion, but rather like a sentence of grumbling roared words.
 Ocelots eat small animals. When they can, they prey on monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds. Almost all the animals that ocelots hunt are much smaller than they are.
 Scientists think that ocelots track and hunt their prey by using their sense of smell. They sniff where they have been on the ground.
 They can see very well in the dark with night vision and move unnoticed. Ocelots hunt their prey by optically matching their surroundings and then rushing at their prey.
 If a small group of organisms (a small population) is separated from the main population from which it came (for example, if it moves across a mountain range or river, or if it moves to a new island so that it cannot easily return), they will often find themselves in a different environment than before.
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new population needs different features or adaptations to be a strong competitor than what it needed before.
 The original population has not changed at all. It still needs the same adaptations as before.
 Over time, the new population begins to adapt to its new environment, and then it looks less and less like the other population.
 After thousands or even millions of years, two populations look so different that they can no longer be assigned to the same species.
 This process is called speciation, which simply means the creation of new species. Speciation is an inevitable consequence and a very important part of evolution.
 Plants generate oxygen that humans breathe, and they take up the carbon dioxide that humans exhale (that is, breathe out).
 Plants produce their food through photosynthesis using the sun. They also provide shade.
 We build our houses from plants and make clothes from plants. We eat mostly plants. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The Mosasaurus was the largest predator of its time, so it feared nothing except other Mosasauruses.
 Its long jaws were equipped with more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, plus another set in the palate, which meant that there was no escape for any animal that crossed its path.
 We don't know for sure, but he may have had a forked tongue. He ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and may have even been a cannibal.
 He also grabbed everything that came into the water; even a big dinosaur like the T. Rex was not up to him.
 While we know most of their food, the Romans had their share of strange or unusual feasts, including wild boar, peacock, snails and a type of rodent called a seven-toed hedgehog.
 Another difference was that the poor people and women ate their meals sitting on stools, while the rich men preferred to hold joint banquets, where they lay on their sides while eating their meals.
 The courts of ancient Rome could not contain foods that came to Europe from America or Asia in later centuries.
 They had no maize, no tomatoes, no potatoes, no cocoa, and no Roman ever tasted a turkey.
 The Babylonians built a main temple to each of their gods, which was considered the house of the god.
 They brought sacrifices to the gods and the priests tried to comply with the will of the gods through ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open temple courtyard and then an inner altar room, which could only be entered by priests.
 Sometimes special pyramid-shaped towers, called ziggurats, were built as part of the temples.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, houses did not have such a great significance.
 Most of the Hebrew family's life took place outdoors.
 The women cooked in the yard. Shops consisted of simply open shop windows. Stone was used for building houses.
 There were no large forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated. In the old Norse sagas it is said that Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder and when he continued westward he found Greenland and gave it the name Greenland.
 But regardless of his discovery, Eskimo tribes were already living there at that time.
 Although all the countries were "Scandinavian", there were many differences between the people, the kings, the customs and the history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland.
 If you have seen the movie "The Templar Legacy," you may think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 That is not true. Although something is written on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence, the words "original Declaration of Independence, dated July 4, 1776" were written. The text is upside down on the underside of the document.
 Although no one knows for sure who wrote it, it is known that the large parchment document (which measures 29¾ inches x 24½ inches) was rolled up for storage at the beginning of its life.
 It is therefore possible that the remark was simply added as a label.
 The landings on D-Day and the subsequent fighting liberated northern France, but the south was still not free.
 "It was ruled by the 'Vichy' French. These were Frenchmen who had made peace with the Germans in 1940 and were working with the invaders rather than fighting them."
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded southern France; the invasion was called Operation Dragoon.
 After only two weeks, the Americans and the French liberation troops had liberated the south of France and turned towards Germany.
 A civilization is a distinct culture shared by a significant group of people who live and work together, a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, which means civil, related to the Latin civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or city-state and which also defines the size of a society.
 City-states are the precursors of nations. A civilized culture implies the transmission of knowledge over several generations, a lasting cultural footprint and a proper dissemination.
 Smaller cultures often disappear without leaving relevant historical evidence and fail to be recognized as true civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the 13 states formed a weak central government based on the Articles of Confederation, which consisted only of the Congress.
 Congress was not empowered to levy taxes, and since there was no national executive or judiciary, it relied on the states to enforce its laws, which often did not cooperate.
 He also had no authority to suspend tax laws and tariffs between states.
 The articles required the unanimous consent of all states before they could be amended, and the states took the central government so little seriously that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is together with the German national football team the second most successful in the world and was 2006 FIFA World Champion.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One motor racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions and Italians participate in international competitions and Olympic Games.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 islands (with Honshu being the largest), making it the seventh largest island in the world.
 "Because of the cluster/group of islands, Japan, is geographically often referred to as an ""archipelago""."
 The beginning of Taiwan dates back to the 15th century, when European sailors passed by and documented the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, or beautiful island.
 1624 The Dutch East India Company establishes a settlement in southwestern Taiwan, initiating a change in the indigenous rice farming methods and employing Chinese laborers on its rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, Qing Dynasty (1644-1912) forces took control of Taiwan's western and northern coastal regions and declared Taiwan a province of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, which ceded sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which ruled the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu consists mainly of three buildings, namely the Intihuatana, the Sun Temple and the Room of the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edges of the complex have been rebuilt to give tourists a better idea of how they originally looked.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most widely used image format in the world is 35 mm, which corresponds to the dominant film size at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still produced today, but more importantly, its image format has been adopted by digital camera image sensors.
 In fact, the so-called 35mm format measures, confusingly, 36mm wide and 24mm high.
 The aspect ratio of this format (divided by twelve, to obtain the simplest integer ratio) is therefore referred to as 3:2.
 Many common formats (the APS format family, for example) have exactly the same or a very similar aspect ratio.
 The much-maligned and often ridiculed Rule of Thirds is a simple guideline that creates dynamics and at the same time preserves a measure of order in a picture.
 It states that the intersection of the lines that divide a picture into thirds vertically and horizontally is the most effective place for the main subject (see example).
 In this period of European history, the rich and powerful Catholic Church was under scrutiny.
 For over a thousand years, the Christian religion had held the European states together despite different languages and customs.
 His omnipotence controlled everyone, from the king to the simple citizen.
 One of the important Christian beliefs states that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty and that it is the money of the churches for exactly this reason.
 The central power of the Church had been in Rome for more than a thousand years. This concentration of power and money led many to question whether this principle had been adhered to.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain initiated a naval blockade against Germany.
 The strategy proved effective in cutting off the country from vital military and civilian supplies, although this blockade violated generally accepted international law codified by several international agreements over the last two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent ships from advancing into whole sea areas, which was a danger even for neutral ships.
 Since the response to this tactic was limited, Germany expected a similar response to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 In the 1920s, pacifism and isolationism were the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and countries.
 After the experience of the horrors and atrocities of the First World War, the nations wanted to avoid a similar situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States of America to take a position with the Edison Company in New York City.
 He came to the United States with 4 cents in his possession, a book of poems and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor (his boss at his previous job) to Thomas Edison.
 Ancient China had a unique method of indicating different eras. Each period of time in China and each family that was in power was a separate dynasty.
 Between the individual dynasties there were also unstable times of divided provinces. The best known of these periods was the Three Kingdoms era, which lasted 60 years between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 In those times, fierce wars raged among many nobles who fought for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms period was one of the bloodiest in the history of ancient China, with thousands of people dying in the struggle for the highest throne in the great palace of Xi'an.
 There are a lot of social and political effects like the use of the metric system, a shift from absolutism to republicanism and nationalism, and the belief that the land belongs to the people and not to a ruler alone.
 After the revolution, all professions were open to all male applicants, so that the most ambitious and best could succeed.
 The same goes for the military, because instead of class-based army rankings, the caliber-based army rankings were now in place.
 The French Revolution also inspired many oppressed working-class people in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was very interested in things beyond the everyday life. He often visited a cave known as "Hira" on the mountain of "Nur" (Light) to meditate.
 The cave itself has survived the ages and offers a vivid picture of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 The cave is located on the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca and is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 In fact, it is not easy to find, even if you know it exists. Once you are inside the cave, you are completely isolated.
 You see nothing but the clear, beautiful sky above and the numerous surrounding mountains. From the inside of the cave, very little of this world can be seen or heard.
 The Cheops Pyramid is the only one of the seven wonders of the world that still stands today.
 Built by the Egyptians in the third century B.C., the Cheops Pyramid is one of many large pyramid structures built to honor deceased pharaohs.
 The Giza Plateau or the Giza Necropolis in the Egyptian Valley of the Kings includes several pyramids (of which the Great Pyramid is the largest), several small tombs, several temples and the great Sphinx.
 The Great Pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Cheops and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs and temples were built in honor of Cheops wives and family members.
 The "spread" symbol looks like a V and the "cut" symbol like a bracket or a square with the bottom line missing.
 Up means that you start at the top and push the bow. Down means that you start at the frog (that's where your hand holds the bow) and pull the bow.
 Stroking usually generates a softer sound, while scratching is stronger and more expressive.
 You are welcome to add your own pencil markings; however, please remember that the printed sheet markings are there for musical reasons, and should be respected as such.
 The panicked King Louis XIV, Queen Marie-Antoinette, their two young children (11-year-old Marie-Thérèse and 4-year-old Louis-Charles) and the King's sister, Madame Elisabeth, were forced to return to Paris on 6 October 1789 by a mob of market women.
 They traveled back to Paris in a carriage, surrounded by a screaming mob of people who were shouting threats against the king and queen.
 The mob forced the king and queen to open the windows of their carriages wide.
 At one point, a member of the angry mob swung the head of a royal guard killed at Versailles in front of the horrified queen.
 The war expenses of the US imperialists in the conquest of the Philippines were borne by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U.S. colonial regime to cover the bulk of expenditures, and the interest from bonds flowed through Wall Street banking houses in the name of the Philippine government.
 Of course, the superprofits that came from the continued exploitation of the Filipino people were the basic gains of US imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that led to the founding of the order.
 The era in which the events took place is commonly referred to as the High Middle Ages, a period in European history that spans the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (1000–1300 CE).
 The High Middle Ages preceded the Early Middle Ages, followed by the Late Middle Ages, which ended around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a wide range of ideas in practice, from technology push or technological imperative to the strict sense that human destiny is determined by an underlying logic associated with scientific laws and their manifestation in technology.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism share two general ideas. First, that the development of technology itself follows a path that is largely beyond cultural or political influence, and second, that technology itself has “effects” on societies that are more inherent than social.
 One could argue that the automobile inevitably brings with it the development of roads.
 However, a nationwide road network for only a small number of cars is not economically viable, so new production methods are being developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 The widespread ownership of automobiles also leads to a higher number of accidents on the roads, which in turn leads to the invention of new techniques in the healthcare industry to repair damaged bodies.
 Romanticism had a strong, culturally deterministic element, which was drawn from writers such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the context of Romanticism, it is geography that shaped individuals. With time, customs and cultures emerged with reference to this geography and these, since they were in harmony with the place of society, were better than arbitrarily octroi laws.
 Just as Paris is known as the fashion capital of the world today, Constantinople was the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 Its fame as a center of luxury began around 400 AD and lasted until about 1100 AD.
 Its status declined during the twelfth century, which was mainly due to the fact that the Crusaders returned with gifts such as silk and spices, which were considered more valuable than the offerings of the Byzantine markets.
 At this time, the title of the world's fashion capital also moved from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its peak in the period between the 10th and 11th and the 14th century.
 At the beginning, the clothing was strongly influenced by the culture of Byzantium in the East.
 However, the styles in the West are 25 to 30 years behind because of the slow communication channels.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the most important developments of the time was that people, as a result of the Crusades, began to use buttons to fasten their clothes.
 Subsistence agriculture is agriculture that aims to produce just enough food to meet the needs of the farmer and his/her family.
 Subsistence farming is a simple, often biological type of farming that uses saved, locally-grown seed and combines it with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize yield.
 In the past, most farmers practiced subsistence farming and in many developing countries this is still the case.
 Subcultures bring together like-minded people who feel neglected by societal norms, and allow them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures can be distinguished from others in terms of age, ethnicity, class, location and/or gender of members.
 The characteristics that distinguish a subculture as such can be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual or geographical nature or a combination of these factors.
 Members of a subculture often signal their membership by an unmistakable and symbolic style, which includes fashion, habits and jargon.
 One of the most common methods of illustrating the importance of socialization is to rely on the few unfortunate cases of children who, due to neglect, accident or deliberate abuse during their childhood, were not socialized by adults.
 "Such children are called ""wild"" or feral. Some feral children were kept by humans (usually their own parents); in some cases, the neglect of the child was due to the parents' inability to accept the child's considerable intellectual or physical limitations."
 Wolf children may have experienced severe child abuse or traumatic experiences before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Others were raised by animals; some lived alone in the wild.
 If it was completely raised by animals, the wild child shows behaviors (within the limits of its physical possibilities) that are almost completely in accordance with those of its specific caregiver, such as its fear or indifference towards humans.
 While project-based learning should make the learning process easier and more interesting, the "scaffolding" goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning method, but rather a support that helps individuals in a novel learning situation, such as when using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 Scaffolding can be both virtual and real. In other words, a teacher is a form of scaffolding, but so is the little Office clipboard in Microsoft Office.
 Virtual help is built into the software and should question, suggest and explain work steps that the student alone may not be able to cope with.
 Children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons, ranging from neglect to abuse to extortion.
 No child should be forced to grow up in an environment that is not caring, loving and education-oriented, but many are forced to.
 For us, the system of foster care is a piece of security for these children.
 Our foster care system is supposed to provide a safe home, loving caregivers, a stable education, and reliable health care.
 The foster home is supposed to cover all the needs that they did not have in the home from which they were taken.
 The Internet connects both elements of mass communication, as well as interpersonal communication.
 The specificities of the Internet have led to additional dimensions in terms of the utility and reward approach.
 For example, "learning" and "socialization" are cited as important motivations for Internet use (James et al., 1995).
 "Personal commitment" and "continuing relationships" were also identified as new motivational aspects by Eighmey and McCord (1998) when they investigated audience reactions to Web sites.
 The use of video recordings led to important insights for the interpretation of microexpressions, facial movements lasting a few milliseconds.
 In particular, it is claimed that one can tell whether someone is lying by correctly interpreting minor changes in facial expression.x
 In his article The President's Speech, Oliver Sacks showed how people who can no longer understand language because of brain damage can still correctly assess the honesty of people.
 He even claims that the ability to interpret human behavior may be shared with animals like domestic dogs.
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two pools of genetic variation: hidden and expressed.
 Mutation provides new genetic variation and selection removes this from the pool of expressed variation.
 Segregation and recombination mix the variation between the two pools back and forth with each generation.
 Out in the savannah, it is difficult for a primate with a digestive system like the human one to cover its amino acid needs from available plant sources.
 Moreover, it has serious consequences if one omits it: Growth depression, malnutrition and ultimately death.
 The most easily accessible plant resources would have been the proteins in leaves and legumes, but these are difficult to digest for primates like us, unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, animal food sources (ants, termites, eggs) are not only easily digestible, but also provide large amounts of protein that contain all essential amino acids.
 Overall, it should not surprise us that our own ancestors solved their “protein problem” in a similar way to how chimpanzees do in the savannah today.
 Sleep interruption is the process of deliberately waking up during normal sleep periods and falling asleep shortly thereafter (10-60 minutes).
 This can be easily achieved by using a relatively quiet alarm clock to alert you without fully waking you up.
 If you are someone who imagines the alarm clock in your sleep, you can put it on the other side of the room so that you are forced to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Another biorhythm-based option is to drink a lot of liquid before bed (especially water or tea, which is known for its diuretic effect), so that you are forced to get up to urinate.
 The degree of inner peace a person possesses correlates inversely with the degree of tension in body and mind.
 The lower the tension, the more positive the life force. Every person has the potential to find absolute peace and contentment.
 Everyone can attain enlightenment. The only thing that stands in the way of this goal is our own tension and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of Buddha, but has been expanded by the path of love of Mahayana and numerous techniques of Indian yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple. It consists of Kundalini Yoga, Meditation and the Path of Compassion.
 Kundalini Yoga awakens the Kundalini energy (awakening energy) through yoga poses, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 The center of Tibetan meditation is the God-Yoga. Through the visualization of various deities, the energy channels are cleaned, the chakras are opened and the enlightened consciousness arises.
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the USA. After the war, the clash of systems, the course and culture led to the fact that the countries became hostile.
 Two years after the end of the war, the former Allies were now enemies and the Cold War began.
 It was to last for the next 40 years and in reality would be fought out by proxy armies on battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba and many other places.
 On 17 September 1939, the Polish defence had already collapsed completely and the only hope was a retreat and reorganisation along the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans were, however, rendered obsolete almost overnight, when over 800,000 soldiers of the Red Army of the Soviet Union poured into the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts and created them, after they had invaded the eastern regions of Poland in violation of the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact and other bilateral and multilateral international treaties.
 The use of ships for the transport of goods is by far the most efficient method for transporting large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The Navy's traditional mission has been to ensure that a nation remains capable of moving people and goods, while at the same time impeding an enemy's ability to move people and goods.
 One of the most significant recent examples of this is the North Atlantic Campaign in World War II, when the Americans tried to bring manpower and material across the Atlantic to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy tried to stop this traffic mainly with submarines.
 Had the Allies failed, Germany would probably have conquered Britain, just as it had conquered the rest of Europe.
 Goats were apparently already domesticated in the Zagros Mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 Ancient cultures and tribes began to keep them as livestock to easily get their milk, fur, meat and skin.
 House goats were usually kept in herds that wandered over hills or other pastureland.  The goats were tended by goatherds, much like the more familiar shepherds; often these were children or adolescents. This grazing method is still used today.
 As early as the 16th century, in England, they built conveyor rails.
 Although the tram rails were only made of parallel wooden boards, they allowed the horses that pulled the wagons to reach higher speeds and pull heavier loads than on the somewhat rougher roads of the time.
 Very early on, thresholds were introduced to secure the position of the rails. However, it was gradually recognised that rails that carry a strip of iron are more efficient.
 This was common, but the iron caused more wear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Finally, wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels. In 1767, the first completely iron rails were introduced.
 The first known means of transportation was walking. Man began to walk upright two million years ago with the emergence of Homo erectus (which means “upright man”).
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecus, did not walk upright as regularly.
 Bipedal species are found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have walked on two legs as early as seven million years ago.
 We can live more environmentally friendly, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even become activists to alleviate future suffering.
 This is in many cases just like a symptomatic treatment. If you do not want only temporary solutions, then we should find and treat the root of the problem.
 It is really obvious that the world has changed a lot due to the scientific and technological advancements of humanity and the problems due to overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of people have become more serious.
 After its passage by the Congress on July 4, a handwritten draft, signed by Congress President John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson, was sent a few blocks away to the printing shop of John Dunlap.
 Between 150 and 200 copies were made overnight, which are now known as the "Dunlap broadsides".
 The first public reading of the document was given by John Nixon in the yard of Independence Hall on July 8.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, who read it to his troops in New York on July 9. A copy reached London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap broadsides that remain are the oldest surviving copies of the document. The original manuscript did not survive the ages.
 Many paleontologists now believe that there is a group of dinosaurs that survived and are still living today. We call them birds.
 Many people do not see them as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But many things about birds still look like a dinosaur.
 They have feet with scales and claws, lay eggs and walk on both hind legs like a Tyrannosaurus rex.
 Almost all computers in use today are based on the processing of information encoded in the form of binary numbers.
 A binary number can only have one of two values, namely 0 or 1, and these numbers are called binary digits - or bits, to use computer jargon.
 An internal poisoning may not be immediately recognizable. The symptoms, for example, vomiting, are so general that one cannot immediately make a diagnosis.
 The best sign of poisoning by swallowing may be the presence of an open container of medication or toxic household chemicals.
 Look on the label for specific first aid instructions for this particular poison.
 The term "Wanze" is used by entomologists in a formal sense for this insect group.
 This term is derived from the ancient familiarity with bedbugs. These are insects that are very adaptable in parasitizing humans.
 Both bedbugs and cockroaches are nidicol, meaning they are adapted to live in the nest or shelter of their hosts.
 In the United States of America, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis (MS), making it the most common neurological disease in adults of younger and middle age.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Studies have shown that women are twice as likely to develop MS as men.
 A couple may decide that it is not in their own best interest or in the best interest of their child to raise a baby.
 These couples can choose to adopt a plan for their baby.
 In an adoption, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can take over parenting.
 The main goal of science is to find out how the world works, using the scientific method. This method is indeed the basis of most scientific investigations.
 It is not only about experimentation, where an experiment is a test that is used to rule out one or more of the possible hypotheses. Scientific research is also guided by asking questions and conducting observations.
 Scientists and philosophers focused on classical texts and especially on the Bible in Latin.
 Aristotle's views on all scientific matters, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the loss of Greek language skills, the West was cut off from its philosophical and scientific roots in Greece.
 Many observed rhythms in physiology and behavior are often largely based on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.x
 Behavioural patterns that are not only reactions to signals from external cycles are known in most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that can run free-running cycles for a time even in the absence of external signals.
 The Hershey-Chase experiment was one of the key pieces of evidence that DNA is a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used phages or viruses to insert their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They took two experiments, in which they either labeled the phage DNA with radioactive phosphorus or a protein in the phage with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have a wide variety of effects, depending on what kind of mutation it is, what significance the piece of genetic material in question has, and whether the cells in question are germ cells.
 Only mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while mutations elsewhere can lead to cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism attracts people who are interested in visiting natural areas to enjoy the scenery, including wild plants and animals.
 Examples of activities on site are hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks and learning about the ecosystem.
 An example of this is visiting, photographing and studying orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning people leave small provincial towns by car to go to their workplace and are passed by others whose workplace is at the place they have just left.
 In this dynamic pendulum traffic, all are in some way connected to and support a transport system based on the private car.
 Science now points out that this massive carbon economy has brought the biosphere out of one of its stable states, which has supported human evolution for the last two million years.
 Everyone participates in society and uses transportation systems. Almost everyone complains about the transportation systems.
 In developed countries, you will rarely hear complaints about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transport systems lead to such misery, why do they fail every day? Are transport engineers simply incompetent or is something more fundamental going on?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions that take place between the two.
 Unfortunately, the study of traffic flows is difficult, because driver behavior cannot be predicted with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave in a reasonably consistent manner; therefore, traffic flows have a certain constancy and can be roughly described mathematically.
 To better represent the traffic flow, the relationships between the three most important properties were defined: (1) Flow, (2) Density and (3) Speed.
 These relationships help in the planning, design and operation of facilities at the roadway.
 Insects were the first animals to conquer the sky. Their ability to fly helped them to escape predators more easily and find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects can fold their wings along their bodies.
 This gives them a wider selection of small hiding places where they can hide from predators.
 Today, dragonflies and mayflies are the only insects that cannot fold their wings back.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarch claimed that the sun was at the center of the solar system.
 Some people thought he was right, but many believed the opposite: that the solar system, including the sun (and even the other stars) revolved around the earth.
 That seems reasonable, since it doesn't seem like the earth is moving, does it?
 The Amazon is the second longest and the most water-rich river in the world. It carries more than eight times as much water as the second largest river.
 The Amazon is also the widest river in the world, sometimes up to six miles wide.
 As much as 20 percent of the water that flows into the oceans from the planet's rivers comes from the Amazon.
 The Amazon River main stream is 6387 km (3980 miles) long. It takes water from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza were never surpassed in size and the technical perfection of their construction.
 Egyptians in the ancient New Kingdom marveled at the monuments of their ancestors, which were then well over a thousand years old.
 The Vatican City has about 800 inhabitants. It is the smallest independent state in the world and the country with the smallest population.
 The Vatican City uses Italian for its legislation and official communications.
 Italian is also the everyday language of most who work in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of Vatican City are Roman Catholic.
 Basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper have been known to humans since ancient times, as they can all be found in their original form in nature and can be mined with primitive tools.
 Aristotle, a philosopher, proposed the theory that all things are made up of a mixture of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 This corresponded more to the four states of aggregation (in the same order): solid, liquid, gas and plasma. He also put forward the theory that they transform into new substances to form what we see.
 Alloys are basically a mixture of two or more metals. Don't forget that there are many elements in the periodic table.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals. Of course, there are other metals like silver and gold.
 There are also alloys that contain small amounts of non-metallic elements such as carbon.
 The universe is made up of matter. All matter is made up of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so tiny that billions of them would fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 Consequently, the pencil, after its invention, became a good friend to many people.
 Unfortunately, the pencil has been pushed into the background with the advent of newer writing methods, so that it has been pushed back in its status and in its use.
 Nowadays, people write messages on computer screens without ever having to come close to a typewriter.
 One can be curious what will come out of the keyboard, when something newer comes along.
 The atomic bomb is based on the principle that you need energy to put together a nucleus with many protons and neutrons.
 It is like rolling a heavy car up a hill. When the core splits again, some of this energy is released.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they decay at low or even no stimulus.
 The surface of the Moon is made of rock and dust. The outer layer of the Moon is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the near side and 100 km on the far side.
 It is thinner under the sea and thicker under the highlands.
 On the near side there could be more Maria, since the crust is thinner, it was easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 In content theories, the focus is on finding what moves or appeals to people.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs and/or desires that are internalized over the course of their adulthood.
 These theories deal with what makes certain people want to do exactly the things they do, and what influences in their environment cause them to do certain things or not to do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Herzberg's Two-Factor Theory.
 In general, two behaviors can emerge when managers begin to lead their former colleagues. One end of the spectrum is the attempt to remain “one of the guys” (or one of the girls).
 This type of manager has trouble making unpopular decisions, enforcing discipline, making performance evaluations, assigning responsibilities, and holding employees accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, you become a completely different individual, who has to do everything differently than the team did and take everything for himself.
 Ultimately, the team leader is responsible for the success and failure of the team.
 This behavior often leads to conflicts between leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams are managed to the same standards of excellence as conventional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often have the function of a contact point for their immediate physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members, as their teams can meet in different time zones that may not be considered by the local leadership.
 The presence of a real "invisible team" (Larson and LaFasto 1989, p. 109) is also a unique component of a virtual team.
 "The ""invisible team"" is the leadership team to which each member reports. The invisible team sets the standards for each member.x"
 Why would an organization take on the time-consuming process of implementing a learning organization? A goal for the practical implementation of organizational learning concepts is innovation.
 When all available resources are effectively utilized across all departments of an organization, creativity and ingenuity can emerge.
 As a result, the collective work of an organization to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative method to meet customer needs.
 Before an organization can be innovative, leadership must develop a culture of innovation, shared knowledge, and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the Continuum Concept as a method to help organizations become more effective.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition, thus delimiting the research area and making it much more precise.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior supports scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage such as trauma, injury and tumors affect behavior and cause changes in some brain functions.
 New technologies allow us to see and explore certain brain structures and processes for the first time.
 It provides us with a lot of information and material to build simulation models that help us understand the processes in our head.
 Although strongly associated with science fiction, AI is an important branch of computer science that deals with behavior, learning and intelligent adaptation of machines.
 Research in the field of AI includes the creation of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples include control, setting up strategies and timetables, the ability to answer customer diagnoses and questions, as well as handwriting, voice and face recognition.
 Such things have become independent disciplines that concentrate on finding solutions to problems of real life.
 The AI system is now widely used in business, medicine, engineering and the military, and has also been incorporated into numerous software applications for home computers and video games.
 Excursions are an important part of every school class. Not infrequently, a teacher would like to take her students to places that cannot be reached by bus.
 Virtual excursions are a technical solution. Students can view museum pieces, visit an aquarium or admire beautiful works of art from their classroom.
 Sharing an excursion virtually is also a great way to reflect on a trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, students at Bennet School in North Carolina design a website about their trip to the state capital every year. The website is redesigned every year, but the previous versions remain online and serve as a scrapbook.
 Blogs can also help improve students' writing skills. Although students often have sloppy grammar and spelling at the beginning of their blogging experience, this usually changes when there is an audience.
 Since students are often a very critical audience, the blogger makes an effort to improve his writing style to avoid criticism.
 Blogging “forces students to learn more about the world around them.” The need to engage the audience inspires students to write intelligently and interestingly (Toto, 2004).
 Blogging is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages students to continue learning far beyond the traditional school day.
 The appropriate use of blogs "can empower students to become more analytical and critical; by actively responding to Internet materials, students can define their positions in the context of other texts and articulate their own perspectives on particular topics" (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is Canada's charming, bilingual capital and is home to a number of art galleries and museums that present Canada's past and present.
 Further south are the Niagara Falls, and to the north the unspoiled beauty of nature in Muskoka and beyond.
 All these things and more make Ontario what outsiders consider to be typical of Canada.
 Large areas further north are sparsely populated and some are almost uninhabited wilderness.
 A population comparison that surprises many: There are more African Americans living in the USA than Canada has citizens.
 The East African islands are located in the Indian Ocean off the east coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and, in terms of wildlife, a continent of its own.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent nations or belong to France and are known as luxurious seaside resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the country, and it was very successful in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India.
 In the north, the region is bounded by the Sahel zone and in the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean.
 Women: It is recommended that all female travelers claim to be married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 Wearing a ring is also helpful (just not one that looks too expensive.
 Women should recognize that cultural differences can lead to what they would consider an assault, and that it is not unusual to be followed, grabbed, etc.
 Stay consistent when rejecting men, and don't be afraid to defend your position (cultural differences be damned; that doesn't mean it's okay!)
 The present-day Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC and was used by the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinids as a strategic port with the name Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it under the name Casa Branca, only to abandon it after an earthquake in 1755.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city as Dar el Beida and it was named Casablanca by Spanish traders who established trading posts there.
 Casablanca is one of the most uninteresting places to shop in all of Morocco.
 Around the old Medina it is easy to find places where traditional Moroccan goods like tagines, ceramics, leather goods, water pipes and a whole range of Tinnef are sold, but that is all for the tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city of the Democratic Republic of the Congo in the far east near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, especially the city center.
 While Goma is relatively safe, any stay outside of Goma should be carefully planned to learn about the ongoing fighting in North Kivu province.
 The city is also the starting point for climbing the Nyiragongo volcano and for some of the cheapest gorilla tracking tours in Africa.
 You can use Bodabodas (motorcycle taxis) to get around Goma. The usual (local) price is ~500 Congolese Francs for the short ride.x
 This, combined with its relative inaccessibility, has led to "Timbuktu" becoming a metaphor for exotic, far-off lands.
 Although Timbuktu is known as a tourist attraction and has an airport, it is now a poor city.
 In 1990 it was added to the list of endangered World Heritage sites due to the threat of desert sand.
 It was one of the most important stops of Louis Gates PBS special "Wonders of the African World".
 The city stands in stark contrast to the rest of the country's cities, because it has more of an Arabic than an African feel.
 The Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in the northeast of South Africa. It borders Mozambique in the east, Zimbabwe in the north and the Crocodile River in the south.
 The park has an area of 19,500 km² and is divided into 14 different ecozones, each of which supports a different animal life.
 It is one of South Africa's main attractions and is regarded as the flagship of South African National Parks (SANParks).
 Like all South African national parks, the park charges daily conservation and entrance fees.
 It may also be worth buying a Wild Card, which gives access either to selected parks in South Africa or to all South African national parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the namesake of the territory of Hong Kong and is the focus of many tourists.
 The buildings that make up the Hong Kong skyline were compared with a shimmering bar chart that is visible through the presence of the waters of Victoria Harbour.x
 For the best views of Hong Kong, you should leave the island and head to the opposite shore of Kowloon.
 Most of the urban development of Hong Kong Island is densely packed on reclaimed land along the north coast.
 This is the place the British colonists made their own. If you are looking for traces of the area's colonial past, this is a good starting point.
 The Sundarbans are the largest mangrove forest in the world and extend 80 km from the Bangladeshi and Indian hinterland to the coast.
 The Sundarbans have been declared a UNESCO World Heritage Site. The part of the forest that lies within Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests are not only mangrove swamps, however – they also include some of the last remaining stands of the mighty jungle that once covered the Gangetic Plain.
 The Sundarbans extend over an area of 3,850 km², of which a third is covered by water and marshes.
 The Sundarbans have been a nature reserve since 1966, and it is estimated that 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer now live there.
 Buses run all day from the district-wide bus station (on the other side of the river), with most buses, especially those to the east and Jakar/Bumthang, leaving between 06:30 and 07:30.
 As the buses between the districts are often full, it is advisable to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most districts are served by small Japanese Coaster buses, which are comfortable and stable.
 Shared taxis offer a quick and comfortable way to get to nearby places like Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200).
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a suspension bridge. It spans the Oyapock River and connects the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 Its two towers are 83 meters high, its length is 378 meters and it has two lanes with 3.50 m width.
 The clearance under the bridge is 15 meters. The construction work was completed in August 2011, but the opening for traffic was not until March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational in September 2017, when the Brazilian customs checkpoints are expected to be completed.
 The Guaraní were the most important indigenous group inhabiting present-day eastern Paraguay. They lived as semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers who also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was also home to other groups of indigenous tribes, such as the Guaycurú and the Payaguá, who survived by hunting, gathering and fishing.x
 Paraguay, formerly called the Great Province of the West Indies, was created in the 16th century as a result of the encounter between the Spanish conquerors and the indigenous groups.
 The Spanish began the colonization period, which lasted three centuries.
 Since the founding of Asunción in 1537, Paraguay has managed to preserve much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having the best polo team and players in the world.
 The biggest tournament of the year takes place in December on Las Cañitas polo fields.
 Smaller tournaments and competitions can also be viewed at other times of the year.x
 Information about competitions and sales points for polo tickets can be found at the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Pound (FKP), whose value is fixed in line with the value of the British Pound (GBP).
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on the island, which is located in Stanley opposite the FIC West Store.
 The British Pound is generally accepted everywhere on the islands and at Stanley credit cards are also often accepted. US dollars are also frequently accepted.
 On the remote islands, credit cards are probably not accepted, although British and US currency may be accepted; check with the owners in advance to find out which payment method is accepted.
 It is almost impossible to exchange the currency of the Falkland Islands outside the Islands themselves, so you should exchange the money before leaving the Island.x
 Since Montevideo is south of the equator, it is summer there when it is winter in the northern hemisphere and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics. In the summer months, temperatures above +30 ° C are common.
 Winter can be deceivingly cool: Temperatures rarely drop below freezing, but wind and humidity make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no pronounced rainy or dry seasons: The amount of precipitation remains more or less the same throughout the year.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people, the wildlife is still wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 According to the Park Authority, visitors should keep at least 100 yards/meters away from bears and wolves and 25 yards/meters away from all other wild animals!
 No matter how peaceful bison, elk, moose, bears and practically all large animals may appear, it can happen that they attack.
 Dozens of visitors are injured every year because they don't give the animals enough space. These animals are big, wild and potentially dangerous, so give them plenty of room.
 Also be aware that smells can attract bears and other wildlife, so avoid carrying or cooking strongly scented foods and keep your camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa, located on the island of Upolu, and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1750s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The harbor was the scene of an inglorious standoff between the Navy in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Great Britain refused to leave the harbor.
 All ships except one British cruiser were sunk. Nearly 200 Americans and Germans were killed.
 During the Mau Movement-organised independence struggle, a peaceful meeting in the town led to the killing of the paramount chief Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Since Auckland stretches over two harbours, there are many beaches. The most popular beaches are in three areas.
 The beaches of North Shore (in the district of North Harbour) are located on the Pacific Ocean and extend from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 Almost all are sandy beaches with safe swimming and most offer shade, provided by Pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive are located at the port of Waitemata, in the upscale suburbs of Mission Bay and St. Heliers in Central Auckland.
 There are family beaches that are sometimes crowded, with a nice shopping promenade along the coast. Swimming is safe here.
 The most important local beer is “Number One”. It is not a complex beer, but pleasant and refreshing. The other local beer is called “Manta”.
 There are many French wines to drink, but the New Zealand and Australian wines are perhaps more palatable.
 The local tap water is safe to drink, but if you are concerned, you can also easily find bottled water.
 "For Australians, the idea of a flat white is foreign. A small black coffee is an espresso, cappuccino is topped high with foam (not froth) and tea is served without milk."
 The hot chocolate is Belgian standard. Fruit juices are expensive, but excellent.
 Many diving trips take place throughout the year and injuries due to any of these causes on the reef are rare.x
 However, you should follow the advice of authorities, pay attention to all signs and especially pay attention to safety warnings.
 Jellyfish occur in the vicinity of beaches and near river mouths from October to April north of 1770. They can occasionally occur outside this time period.
 Sharks exist, but they rarely attack people. Most sharks are afraid of people and would swim away.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not live actively in the sea, their primary habitat is in river mouths north of Rockhampton.
 A booking in advance gives the traveler the assurance that he will have a place to stay when he arrives at his destination.
 Travel agencies often have arrangements with specific hotels, although you may also be able to book other accommodations, such as campgrounds, through a travel agency.x
 Travel agencies usually offer packages that include breakfast, transport to and from the airport or even a combination of flight and hotel.
 They can also hold your reservation for you in case you need time to reconsider the offer or to obtain further documents for your travel destination (e.g. visa).
 Any changes or requests should be directed to the travel agency first and not directly to the hotel.
 At some festivals, the vast majority of festival-goers decide to camp on site, and most visitors consider this an important part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action, you have to get there early to get a camping spot near the music.
 Remember that on parts of the festival, music will still be playing late into the night, even after the music has stopped on the main stages.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you cross the northern Baltic in winter, check the position of the cabin, as the breaking of ice causes quite horrible noise for the most affected.
 The cruises to St. Petersburg also offer time for a stay in the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirement (see conditions).
 Casinos usually make every effort to keep guests on site for as long as possible and to let them spend a lot of money. There are usually neither windows nor clocks, and exits are sometimes hard to find.
 They usually have a special offer of food, drinks and entertainment to keep the guests happy and make sure they stay.
 Some venues offer alcoholic drinks free of charge. However, intoxication impairs judgment, and all good players know how important it is to stay sober.
 Whoever wants to drive in high latitudes or over mountain passes should reckon with snow, ice and temperatures below freezing.
 On icy and snowy roads, the grip is low and you can't drive as if you were on bare asphalt.
 In snowstorms, so much snow can fall in a very short time that you can get stuck.
 Visibility may also be impaired by falling or blowing snow or by condensation or ice on the vehicle windows.x
 On the other hand, icy and snowy conditions are normal in many countries, and traffic runs largely uninterrupted throughout the year.
 Safaris are perhaps the biggest tourist attraction in Africa and the highlight for many visitors.
 The term Safari in common usage refers to a land trip to observe the overwhelming African wildlife, especially in the savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to approach cars closely, and the standard equipment allows a good view.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are often shy and you can see them better with a telescope.
 A foot safari (also called bushwalk, trek or footing) is a hike that lasts either a few hours or several days.
 The Paralympics will take place from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events held at other venues across Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic Summer Games, having already hosted the 1964 Games.
 If you have booked your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the postponement was announced, you could find yourself in a difficult situation.
 Cancellation policies vary, but by late March most cancellation policies were waived because of the coronavirus until July 2020, when the Olympics were scheduled.
 It is estimated that most tickets for the event will cost between 2,500¥ and 130,000¥, with an average ticket costing around 7,000¥.
 Ironing wet clothes can help drying them. Many hotels provide iron and ironing board, even if you are not in the room.
 If an iron is not available or one does not want to wear ironed socks, one can try using a hair dryer if one is available.
 Be careful that the fabric does not get too hot (this can cause it to shrink or in extreme cases cause burns).
 There are various methods for purifying water. Some of them are more effective in counteracting certain dangers.
 In some areas, it is enough to boil water for a minute, in others it must be several minutes.
 The effectiveness of filters varies greatly, and if you have concerns, then you should consider buying your water in a sealed bottle from a reputable company.
 Travelers may encounter pests that they are not familiar with from their home regions.
 Pests can destroy food, cause irritation or even trigger allergic reactions, poison or transmit diseases.
 Infections as such or dangerous animals that can injure or kill people with violence are usually not classified as pests.
 Duty-free shopping is the opportunity to buy goods that are exempt from taxes and consumption taxes in certain places.
 Travellers whose destination country has high taxes can sometimes save a considerable amount of money, especially on products such as alcoholic beverages and tobacco.
 The section between Point Marion and Fairmount on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh Highway is the greatest driving challenge, as it often leads through remote, uninhabited terrain.
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, stay alert: steep slopes, narrow roads and sharp curves prevail here.
 The speed limits are markedly lower than in the preceding and following sections - usually 35-40 mph (56-64 km/h) - and their strict observance is even more important than usual.
 But interestingly, the cell phone coverage here is much better than in many other areas of the route, such as the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German baked goods are quite tasty. In Bavaria they are quite nutritious and varied, as well as with the southern neighbor Austria.
 Fruit bread is widespread, with apples being baked into bread all year round and cherries and plums being used in the summer.
 Many German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts or other nuts. Popular cakes often go particularly well with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want to make small but rich pastries, try what is called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen depending on the region.
 A curry is a dish that is based on spices and herbs, along with either meat or vegetables.
 A curry can be either "dry" or "wet" depending on the amount of liquid.
 In the interior of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries; in southern India and some other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 With a selection of 17,000 islands, Indonesian food is an umbrella term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines found throughout the country.
 However, if the term is used without further attributes, it usually refers to the food that originally came from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 The cuisine of Java, which is now widespread throughout the island group, offers a variety of simply spiced dishes. The Javanese prefer to use peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut sugar) and a range of aromatic spices as flavorings.
 Bridles are aids for the feet of riders, which hang down on both sides of the saddle.
 They give the rider more stability, but there are safety concerns because the rider's feet could get caught in them.
 If a rider falls off a horse and gets his foot caught in the stirrup, he can be dragged along if the horse runs through. To minimize this risk, a number of safety precautions can be taken.
 First of all, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, rather narrow sole.
 Also, some saddles, particularly English saddles, have safety stirrups that allow a stirrup leather to fall off the saddle as soon as it is pulled backward by a falling rider.
 The Cochamó Valley – Chile’s premier climbing destination, known as the Yosemite of South America, with a plethora of big granite walls and cliffs.
 The peaks offer a breathtaking view. Climbers from all over the world are constantly discovering new routes along the walls, which offer endless possibilities.
 Downhill sports such as skiing and snowboarding are popular sports in which one attaches skis or a snowboard to one's feet and rides down a snow-covered surface.
 Skiing is a popular travel activity with many enthusiasts, sometimes known as "ski bums", who plan their entire vacation around skiing at a particular location.
 The idea of skiing is very old – cave paintings with depictions of skiers go back to 5000 BC!
 The origins of skiing as a sport go back at least to the 17th century, and the first recreational ski club in Australia was opened by Norwegians in 1861.
 Ski hiking with backpack: This activity is also called ski touring or ski hiking.
 It resembles alpine touring skiing or mountaineering, but does not necessarily include it, as the latter is performed in steep terrain and requires much firmer skis and boots.
 Think of the ski route as a comparable hiking route.
 In good conditions, you are able to cover some greater distances than when hiking – only very rarely will you reach the speed of cross-country skiing on well-maintained trails without a heavy backpack.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but has many independent countries. Normally, you would have to apply for several visas and go through several passport controls if you want to travel through several countries.
 The Schengen area, however, works in this respect a little like a country.
 As long as you stay in this zone, you can normally cross the borders without having to go through passport control again.
 Accordingly, you do not need to apply for a visa for each of the Schengen member states individually, which saves time, money and bureaucracy.
 There is no universally accepted definition of what constitutes an antique. Some tax authorities define goods over 100 years old as antiques.
 The definition has geographical variations, where the age limit may be lower in places like North America than in Europe.
 Handmade products could be called "antique" even though they are younger than similar products from mass production.
 Reindeer husbandry is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture surrounding the trade is also important for many who work in other professions.
 Even in the past, not all Sámi have raised reindeer on a large scale, but have lived from fishing, hunting and similar activities. They kept reindeer mainly as draft animals.
 Today, many Sámi work in modern professions. Tourism is an important source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi region.
 "Although the term 'gypsy' is used mainly by non-Roma, it is often perceived as offensive, as it is associated with negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions of Roma."
 If a travel advisory is issued for the country you will be visiting, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also consult the advice of other governments than your own. Their advice is, however, tailored to their own citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may be confronted with different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 Consultations are only a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The views presented are often superficial, general and too simplified in comparison to the more detailed information that can be found elsewhere.
 A storm is the collective term for any dangerous weather phenomenon with the potential to cause damage, severe social disruption or loss of life.
 Weather can occur anywhere in the world and there are different types of weather that depend on geography, topography and atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, excessive rainfall and forest fires are forms and effects of weather, as well as thunderstorms, tornadoes, water hoses and whirlwinds.
 Regional and seasonal weather phenomena include blizzards, snowstorms, ice storms and dust storms.
 Travellers are urged to watch out for any kind of weather that affects their area, as this can affect all travel plans.
 Anyone planning to travel to a country that is considered a war zone should undergo professional training for it.
 A search on the Internet for "Course on hostile environments" will probably display the address of a local firm.
 A course usually covers all the problems discussed here in much more detail, usually in combination with practical experience.
 A course is usually between 2 and 5 days long and includes role-playing, a lot of first aid and sometimes weapons training.
 There are numerous books and journals on survival in the wilderness, but few publications on war zones.
 Travellers planning to undergo gender reassignment surgery abroad should ensure they have valid travel documents for their return journey.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports with an unspecified gender (X) or documents that have been updated to the desired name and gender varies.
 The willingness of foreign governments to recognize these documents is also very different.
 Security checks at airports have also become much more intrusive since September 11, 2001.
 Transgender people before their operation should not expect their privacy and dignity to be intact when passing through the scanners.
 Rip currents are the returning flow of waves breaking on the beach, often at reefs or the like.
 Because of the underwater topography, the backflow concentrates in a few deeper areas and a fast current can form there down to deep water.
 Most deaths occur through exhaustion while trying to swim against the current, which can prove impossible.
 When you get out of the current, swimming back is not more difficult than normal.
 Try to get somewhere where you won't be caught again. Alternatively, depending on your skills and whether you've been noticed, you might want to wait for rescue.
 The return shock comes earlier than the culture shock (the honeymoon phase is not so pronounced), lasts longer and can be more serious.
 It is sometimes particularly difficult for people who have easily adapted to the new culture to adapt to their original culture.
 When you come back from a stay abroad, you have adapted to a different culture and dropped some of your home culture's behaviours.
 When you first traveled abroad, people were probably patient and understanding because they knew that travelers have to adjust to a new place.
 One might not expect that even returning travelers need patience and understanding.
 The sound and light show at the pyramids is one of the most interesting attractions for children in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and while it is quiet before the show begins.
 Normally, you can hear the noises of tourists and vendors all the time. The history of the noises and the lights is just like a storybook.
 The Sphinx is used as a background and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are depicted on the pyramids, with the various pyramids being illuminated.
 The South Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several countries and have the most stations, with sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago lies 120 km north of the peninsula. The largest is King George Island with the settlement Villa Las Estrellas.
 Other islands are Livingston Island and Deception, where the flooded caldera of an active volcano offers a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworthland is the region south of the peninsula bounded by the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of the peninsula here merge into the plateau and then rise again to form the 360 km long chain of the Ellsworth Mountains, which is divided by the Minnesota Glacier.
 The northern part or the Sentinel Range has the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, whose highest peak is Mount Vinson at 4,892 m.
 In remote areas without cell phone coverage, a satellite phone may be the only option.
 A satellite phone is generally not a replacement for a mobile phone, as you have to be outside and in clear line of sight of a satellite to make a call.
 The service is often used by ships, including pleasure craft, as well as by expeditions that need data and voice communications.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to provide further information about the connection to this service.
 An increasingly popular option for people planning to take a year out are study and work abroad courses.
 This is especially popular with high school graduates, as it allows them to take a year off before university without affecting their studies.
 In many cases, participation in an overseas gap year program can actually improve your chances of getting into college in your home country.
 Usually, a tuition fee is charged for enrolling in these educational programs.
 Finland is a great destination for boating. The “Land of a Thousand Lakes” also has thousands of islands – in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 For the Archipelago and lakes you do not necessarily need a yacht.
 Even if the coastal island groups and the largest lakes are actually large enough for any yacht, smaller boats or even kayaks offer a different experience.
 Boating is the national pastime in Finland, with one in six or seven people owning a boat.
 This is comparable to Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but otherwise quite unique (in the Netherlands, for example, the ratio is one to forty.)
 Most pure Baltic Sea cruises include a longer stay in St. Petersburg in Russia.
 This means that you can visit the historic city for several whole days, while returning in the evening and spending the night on the ship.
 If you only go ashore during the cruise, you do not need a separate visa (as of 2009).
 Some cruises advertise Berlin in Germany as a destination. As you can see on the map above, Berlin is far from the sea, and a visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Flying can be a frightening experience for people of any age and from any walk of life, especially if they have never flown before or have had a traumatic experience.
 There is nothing to be ashamed of: it is nothing more than the personal fears and antipathies that many people have.
 Learning more about how airplanes work and what happens during a flight can help some people overcome the fear that comes with the unknown or the feeling of not being in control.
 Courier companies are well paid for the fast delivery of things. Often, time is a very important factor in business documents, commercial goods or spare parts for urgent repairs.
 On some routes, the larger firms use their own planes, but on other routes and with smaller firms, difficulties arose.
 When they shipped things via air freight, the unloading and customs clearance on some routes could take several days.
 The only way to get it through faster was to send it as unaccompanied baggage. The airline regulations do not allow baggage to be sent without a passenger, and that's where you come in.
 The obvious way to fly first or business class is to pay a lot of money for the privilege (or, even better, get your company to pay for it).
 This is not cheap: As a rough rule of thumb, you can expect to pay up to four times the normal Economy fare for Business and up to eleven times for First Class!
 In general, it is pointless to look for discounts for business or first class seats on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know very well that there is a certain core group of flyers who are willing to pay a lot of money for the privilege of getting to their destination quickly and comfortably, and they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The native language is Romanian, but many people also speak Russian.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic that has suffered ethnic conflicts.
 This conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria in eastern Moldova in 1994, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of political negotiations, economic relations between these two parts of the Republic of Moldova could be restored.
 The most important religion in Moldova is the Christian Orthodox.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million, the second largest port after Istanbul and a very good transport hub.
 The once ancient city of Smyrna is today a modern, progressive and busy business center, located on a vast bay and surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, glass-fronted buildings and modern shopping centres are punctuated by classic red-tiled roofs, the 18th-century market and old mosques and churches, although the city exudes more of a Mediterranean European atmosphere than traditional Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvík offers views of the nearby island of Eysturoy and has an unusual octagonal church.
 On the cemetery there are some interesting marble sculptures of pigeons on some graves.
 It is worthwhile to stroll through the fascinating village for half an hour.
 In the north and in the immediate vicinity is the romantic and fascinating city of Sintra, which became known to foreigners after Lord Byron had described its splendor in bright colors.
 The Scotturb bus 403 runs regularly to Cabo da Roca and Sintra.
 Also visit in the north the great sanctuary of Our Lady of the Rosary of Fatima (pilgrimage site) – a place that is world famous for its Marian apparitions.
 Please remember that you are basically visiting a mass grave as well as a place that has an almost incalculable significance for a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women who survived their time here, and many more with relatives who were murdered or worked to death there, Jews and non-Jews alike.
 Please treat this site with the dignity, respect and reverence it deserves. Do not make jokes about the Holocaust or Nazis.
 Do not deface the site by painting or scratching graffiti.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the inhabitants speak Catalan, the vast majority understand it, and almost everyone can speak Spanish.
 Most signs are only in Catalan, however, as it is legally established as the first official language.
 Nevertheless, Spanish is also widely spoken in public transport and other facilities.
 Normal announcements are made in Catalan only, but unforeseen disruptions are announced by an automated system in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are said to be self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 Even if this is often only an inaccurate cliché, one finds oneself in Paris best if one shows one's best side and behaves like someone who is "bien élevé" (well-bred). This will make it much easier to get along.
 The brusque exterior of the Parisians disappears very quickly if you put basic manners on the day.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily forested, with mainly beech, spruce and fir trees, and offers a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 It has a remarkable diversity of plant communities thanks to its numerous microclimates, different soils and alternating altitudes.
 The area is also home to a very large variety of animal and bird species.
 There are rare fauna such as European brown bears, wolves, eagles, owls, lynxes, wild cats and capercaillie as well as many generally more common species.
 When visiting the monasteries, women must wear skirts that reach to the knees and also cover their shoulders.
 In most monasteries there are wrap dresses for women who come unprepared, but if you bring your own, especially one in bright colors, the monk or nun at the entrance will give you a smile.
 Similarly, men must wear pants that reach above the knee.
 These can also be borrowed from the stock at the entrance, but the clothes are not washed after each user, so you may not feel comfortable in these dresses. For all men there is a standard size!
 The cuisine of Majorca is based, as in similar areas of the Mediterranean, on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork) and always uses olive oil.
 A simple popular evening meal, especially in summer, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomato and any available ingredient such as cheese, tuna etc.
 "All nouns start with a capital letter next to the word you for ""you"" always, even in the middle of a sentence."
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and objects.
 It makes reading easier, but writing is somewhat difficult because one has to determine whether a transitive verb or a predicate adjective is used as the main word.
 Italian pronunciation is relatively easy, as most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The most important letters to pay attention to are c and g, as their pronunciation varies depending on the following vowel.
 "Also, be careful to distinguish between r and rr: caro means ""love"" while carro means ""chariot"".
 Persian has a relatively simple and mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this introductory grammar would help you to learn a lot about Persian grammar and to understand the sentences better.
 If you speak a Romance language, it is of course easier to learn Portuguese.
 People who speak some Spanish might be tempted to think that Portuguese is so similar that it doesn't need to be learned separately.
 Pre-modern observatories are nowadays usually no longer in operation and serve as museums or educational sites.
 Since light pollution was not as much of a problem during its heyday as it is today, they are usually located in cities or university campuses that are easier to reach than those built in more recent times.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge facilities in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The viewing of cherry blossoms, known as Hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 The concept comes from China, where peach blossoms were the flower of choice.
 In Japan, the first cherry blossom festivals were held by the emperor only for himself and other members of the royal family in the vicinity of the imperial court.
 "Plants look best in their natural environment, so resist the temptation to remove even one."
 If you visit a formally laid out garden and take "samples", you will also be thrown out without discussion.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to be, where you can find your way around easily and can buy almost anything after you arrive.
 Since you are in the extreme tropics and only a few degrees north of the equator, you have to expect both heat (always) and strong sun (when the sky is clear, less often).
 There are also a few buses that go north to Hebron, the traditional burial site of the biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you take goes to Hebron and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good basis for holiday planning.
 For example, castle tours in the Loire Valley, in the Rhine Valley or a cruise to interesting cities on the Danube or a boat trip along the Erie Canal.
 They also represent popular hiking and biking routes.
 In Christianity, Christmas is one of the most important holidays and is considered the birthday of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions around the holiday have been adopted by non-believers in Christian and non-Christian countries around the world.
 There is a tradition of spending Easter night at some open place to see the sunrise.
 There are of course Christian-theological explanations for this tradition, but it could also be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 Traditional churches often hold an Easter Vigil on Saturday night, during the Easter weekend, with the celebrations often beginning at midnight, celebrating the resurrection of Christ.
 All animals that originally arrived on the islands came here either by swimming, flying or being washed ashore.
 Due to the great distance from the mainland, mammals were unable to make the journey, making the giant tortoise the main prey on the Galapagos Islands.
 Since the first humans set foot on the Galapagos Islands, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, rats, cats and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic regions in winter, you will experience the polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This is a good opportunity to see the Northern Lights, as the sky is more or less dark all the time.
 Since the areas are sparsely populated and light pollution is often not a problem, you can also enjoy the starry sky.
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners may be used to.
 Suits are part of the standard business attire and colleagues address each other by their family names or job titles.
 Workplace harmony is of crucial importance, with the focus being more on team performance than on praising individual achievements.
 Often, employees must seek the approval of their superiors for all decisions they make and are expected to follow their bosses' instructions unconditionally.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.44623502912648105, 'precisions': [0.7323500099661152, 0.5105304698209613, 0.376479771042019, 0.28169077962719397], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.0147243234496985, 'translation_length': 25085, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 69.0766745469753, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8937667370313712, 'scores': [0.844318687915802, 0.8965712189674377, 0.9117972254753113, 0.796225368976593, 0.8904692530632019, 0.805501401424408, 0.9207804203033447, 0.8719295859336853, 0.9128901362419128, 0.9394522309303284, 0.9123979806900024, 0.9080807566642761, 0.9316230416297913, 0.8996495604515076, 0.8855843544006348, 0.8758536577224731, 0.9123398065567017, 0.9274557828903198, 0.9201005697250366, 0.8546069264411926, 0.9264801740646362, 0.9526705145835876, 0.7909732460975647, 0.9177587032318115, 0.8992543816566467, 0.9200760126113892, 0.8485003113746643, 0.9135565161705017, 0.8546319603919983, 0.9402350783348083, 0.8688642382621765, 0.8405246734619141, 0.8308041095733643, 0.8999657034873962, 0.9159794449806213, 0.9292171597480774, 0.9128869771957397, 0.850037157535553, 0.894473671913147, 0.9275511503219604, 0.9040414690971375, 0.9211010336875916, 0.9182843565940857, 0.8786750435829163, 0.8526991009712219, 0.8597750067710876, 0.8842500448226929, 0.9176698327064514, 0.9331914186477661, 0.9101864695549011, 0.9487243890762329, 0.9319828748703003, 0.8906994462013245, 0.9338567852973938, 0.9172811508178711, 0.9029726982116699, 0.8727303743362427, 0.8986896872520447, 0.9215453267097473, 0.951173722743988, 0.8692329525947571, 0.9260711073875427, 0.8799833655357361, 0.9155178666114807, 0.9024261832237244, 0.8949910998344421, 0.8716859817504883, 0.8282729983329773, 0.9258503913879395, 0.8787232041358948, 0.9137516021728516, 0.8561137318611145, 0.8611706495285034, 0.8636256456375122, 0.8759850263595581, 0.8825476765632629, 0.8768884539604187, 0.9237424731254578, 0.979008138179779, 0.9156796932220459, 0.9124379754066467, 0.9283767342567444, 0.8706950545310974, 0.8684490323066711, 0.7900218963623047, 0.8561142683029175, 0.8755554556846619, 0.9167302250862122, 0.9281750917434692, 0.897768497467041, 0.8531047701835632, 0.8996928334236145, 0.8969969153404236, 0.9698315262794495, 0.9223318696022034, 0.8921268582344055, 0.9008734822273254, 0.9067314267158508, 0.9283719658851624, 0.8597208857536316, 0.9364445209503174, 0.8960095643997192, 0.9047543406486511, 0.9518144726753235, 0.9122297167778015, 0.8098935484886169, 0.9224703907966614, 0.8717430233955383, 0.8759521842002869, 0.8783119916915894, 0.9199908375740051, 0.9311025738716125, 0.9485722780227661, 0.9123203158378601, 0.8739657998085022, 0.8702231049537659, 0.904056966304779, 0.8702015280723572, 0.9795843362808228, 0.8554089069366455, 0.8536565899848938, 0.8819067478179932, 0.9116635918617249, 0.9389781951904297, 0.9202718734741211, 0.9262081980705261, 0.9352200627326965, 0.9083587527275085, 0.89858478307724, 0.9287546873092651, 0.7244074940681458, 0.9103887677192688, 0.9103723764419556, 0.9016943573951721, 0.8773514628410339, 0.893078088760376, 0.8732755184173584, 0.8663339018821716, 0.9524672627449036, 0.8668649196624756, 0.895880937576294, 0.8892534971237183, 0.9335668683052063, 0.9098923802375793, 0.9118364453315735, 0.9187547564506531, 0.9420718550682068, 0.9372988939285278, 0.9049380421638489, 0.9070946574211121, 0.9142309427261353, 0.8865176439285278, 0.8956177830696106, 0.8145867586135864, 0.8528131246566772, 0.9011676907539368, 0.8852476477622986, 0.7254788875579834, 0.9171891808509827, 0.9158070683479309, 0.904291570186615, 0.8692197799682617, 0.8993263840675354, 0.899039089679718, 0.8830843567848206, 0.8871909976005554, 0.8813099265098572, 0.8703320026397705, 0.8724481463432312, 0.9101260304450989, 0.911173939704895, 0.8861092329025269, 0.9387272596359253, 0.8785656094551086, 0.8832210898399353, 0.9390298128128052, 0.8729448914527893, 0.907588541507721, 0.9090279936790466, 0.942289412021637, 0.8820132613182068, 0.9574147462844849, 0.9412400126457214, 0.9271820187568665, 0.8934711813926697, 0.9318452477455139, 0.9751046299934387, 0.9153565764427185, 0.9466497302055359, 0.8770280480384827, 0.8778776526451111, 0.8987318873405457, 0.8699051737785339, 0.8959321975708008, 0.9154610633850098, 0.9403690099716187, 0.9080522060394287, 0.8561663031578064, 0.8936398029327393, 0.8793649077415466, 0.8611024618148804, 0.8509556651115417, 0.8389310836791992, 0.8360512852668762, 0.8937548398971558, 0.8940904140472412, 0.9022197127342224, 0.9143368601799011, 0.8637351393699646, 0.9471786022186279, 0.939824640750885, 0.9294127225875854, 0.9334993958473206, 0.8989899754524231, 0.9353491067886353, 0.8678620457649231, 0.9018924236297607, 0.9136666655540466, 0.8910550475120544, 0.9213560819625854, 0.9624380469322205, 0.88059002161026, 0.9050788283348083, 0.8838369846343994, 0.9335041642189026, 0.9508988261222839, 0.878106415271759, 0.9118428826332092, 0.8939560055732727, 0.7975710034370422, 0.9278683066368103, 0.8808578252792358, 0.8375518321990967, 0.9208933711051941, 0.866044819355011, 0.9006724953651428, 0.9090452790260315, 0.8964089155197144, 0.9520721435546875, 0.90349280834198, 0.8093310594558716, 0.7634187936782837, 0.9202465415000916, 0.7681472301483154, 0.8677031397819519, 0.8813583254814148, 0.8547337651252747, 0.8366333842277527, 0.8403260111808777, 0.9498860239982605, 0.9065539240837097, 0.924357533454895, 0.9094472527503967, 0.9146870970726013, 0.9442796111106873, 0.9135279655456543, 0.9501349329948425, 0.895818293094635, 0.9206119179725647, 0.9135015606880188, 0.9229922294616699, 0.8125613331794739, 0.9422146081924438, 0.8122608661651611, 0.9241759777069092, 0.8593812584877014, 0.9015018343925476, 0.8205574154853821, 0.9453566074371338, 0.9223974347114563, 0.8881644010543823, 0.7863970398902893, 0.8674607872962952, 0.8676372766494751, 0.7769157886505127, 0.8197893500328064, 0.6966820955276489, 0.9026299715042114, 0.8985502123832703, 0.9422914981842041, 0.9190075397491455, 0.882784903049469, 0.8890697360038757, 0.9280536770820618, 0.9213635921478271, 0.9469459652900696, 0.933068037033081, 0.8865289092063904, 0.9126265645027161, 0.9253838658332825, 0.8857166767120361, 0.8268224000930786, 0.8925897479057312, 0.8715223073959351, 0.7036347389221191, 0.9066486954689026, 0.8690550923347473, 0.9444748759269714, 0.9435768723487854, 0.9034495949745178, 0.945408284664154, 0.8974944949150085, 0.8861694931983948, 0.9160724878311157, 0.908647358417511, 0.9205648899078369, 0.8789305090904236, 0.8222683072090149, 0.9240744709968567, 0.923044741153717, 0.9121971726417542, 0.9124965667724609, 0.9506255984306335, 0.7301556468009949, 0.9519791007041931, 0.8736055493354797, 0.8941622376441956, 0.8674041628837585, 0.949923038482666, 0.9141774773597717, 0.8721151947975159, 0.8971907496452332, 0.9134179353713989, 0.8693338632583618, 0.916523277759552, 0.8668542504310608, 0.8752326369285583, 0.8728758692741394, 0.913990318775177, 0.9049266576766968, 0.9132250547409058, 0.9024040102958679, 0.9263008236885071, 0.9301865100860596, 0.9206551909446716, 0.9324774146080017, 0.9015830755233765, 0.8995433449745178, 0.8698319792747498, 0.9129422307014465, 0.864189088344574, 0.9157135486602783, 0.8898844122886658, 0.8307872414588928, 0.9054882526397705, 0.9428276419639587, 0.928504467010498, 0.9109010100364685, 0.9069486260414124, 0.8143552541732788, 0.9167797565460205, 0.9177377223968506, 0.900206983089447, 0.9526713490486145, 0.914633572101593, 0.9043150544166565, 0.8946025967597961, 0.887040376663208, 0.9102505445480347, 0.8613981604576111, 0.8799338936805725, 0.8976891040802002, 0.932442843914032, 0.8032020926475525, 0.8690997362136841, 0.8580223917961121, 0.8568201661109924, 0.9031663537025452, 0.8220893740653992, 0.8432464599609375, 0.8412118554115295, 0.7969459891319275, 0.8673831820487976, 0.9274420142173767, 0.9360386729240417, 0.9232792854309082, 0.8970364332199097, 0.9377842545509338, 0.8793477416038513, 0.9338958859443665, 0.9294707179069519, 0.9058120250701904, 0.8614192605018616, 0.8775829076766968, 0.7828052639961243, 0.8479604125022888, 0.8558774590492249, 0.7630136013031006, 0.857112467288971, 0.8970627188682556, 0.8988399505615234, 0.8813393712043762, 0.9306488633155823, 0.9510148763656616, 0.8722771406173706, 0.901652991771698, 0.8295831084251404, 0.9713082909584045, 0.8559577465057373, 0.9509009718894958, 0.9295310378074646, 0.85984206199646, 0.9168156981468201, 0.8634201884269714, 0.8995019793510437, 0.891790509223938, 0.9221668243408203, 0.9095000624656677, 0.9379059672355652, 0.8768793940544128, 0.9235347509384155, 0.869534432888031, 0.8916556239128113, 0.9350400567054749, 0.8721701502799988, 0.8975057005882263, 0.9039062261581421, 0.910275399684906, 0.9007933139801025, 0.9460048079490662, 0.9298260807991028, 0.9067679047584534, 0.8687102198600769, 0.8674144744873047, 0.8789950609207153, 0.9303398728370667, 0.9081944823265076, 0.9210582375526428, 0.9390094876289368, 0.9535791277885437, 0.8988611698150635, 0.8827874064445496, 0.8665770888328552, 0.8837974071502686, 0.8799089789390564, 0.8626558780670166, 0.9007146954536438, 0.8964681029319763, 0.9037330746650696, 0.866943895816803, 0.8813499808311462, 0.9162436127662659, 0.9551727175712585, 0.918630063533783, 0.8735740780830383, 0.9282680153846741, 0.9291676878929138, 0.9015974402427673, 0.9319331049919128, 0.8806812763214111, 0.9212034344673157, 0.883216142654419, 0.9174752831459045, 0.8747893571853638, 0.8709376454353333, 0.8681892156600952, 0.8525324463844299, 0.9200831055641174, 0.88983154296875, 0.8933512568473816, 0.9351255297660828, 0.8864145874977112, 0.8972324728965759, 0.9116448760032654, 0.8916851282119751, 0.8872256278991699, 0.8783634901046753, 0.7571513056755066, 0.8507580161094666, 0.694685697555542, 0.8513438105583191, 0.8199732899665833, 0.9014742374420166, 0.8596214056015015, 0.8086795210838318, 0.8849803805351257, 0.8786163926124573, 0.8951102495193481, 0.9205504059791565, 0.9294121861457825, 0.8881864547729492, 0.9109959602355957, 0.9110404849052429, 0.857944130897522, 0.9243277907371521, 0.8958677053451538, 0.905854344367981, 0.8345234990119934, 0.9128638505935669, 0.9252292513847351, 0.8810317516326904, 0.8582058548927307, 0.9263707995414734, 0.8990615010261536, 0.8732743263244629, 0.8763838410377502, 0.9155274033546448, 0.896834671497345, 0.9305554628372192, 0.9421434998512268, 0.9155309200286865, 0.9111621975898743, 0.8968474864959717, 0.884212076663971, 0.841266930103302, 0.8685182929039001, 0.7994866371154785, 0.8649231791496277, 0.8684771060943604, 0.8889638781547546, 0.8475061058998108, 0.7907581925392151, 0.9140923619270325, 0.8892554640769958, 0.8491450548171997, 0.9468463659286499, 0.8796036243438721, 0.9141612648963928, 0.8595331907272339, 0.9477187991142273, 0.9245738387107849, 0.9045323729515076, 0.8878887295722961, 0.8512200713157654, 0.8978021740913391, 0.940343976020813, 0.9318366646766663, 0.885601818561554, 0.8904792666435242, 0.8535426259040833, 0.9023939371109009, 0.9091842770576477, 0.8770947456359863, 0.8909141421318054, 0.8843867778778076, 0.8053465485572815, 0.862307071685791, 0.8853518962860107, 0.9375667572021484, 0.9319900274276733, 0.8798134326934814, 0.900141179561615, 0.854107677936554, 0.880203902721405, 0.8723406791687012, 0.9438137412071228, 0.8847168684005737, 0.8890535831451416, 0.8145553469657898, 0.9130013585090637, 0.8565685749053955, 0.9163942337036133, 0.8675393462181091, 0.9039679169654846, 0.9033318161964417, 0.8471129536628723, 0.8460971713066101, 0.816911518573761, 0.867429792881012, 0.8474218249320984, 0.920940637588501, 0.9098296761512756, 0.8995457887649536, 0.9098565578460693, 0.9050019383430481, 0.8967354893684387, 0.8723912835121155, 0.8749810457229614, 0.8992506861686707, 0.876531720161438, 0.9517168998718262, 0.9454249739646912, 0.8330438733100891, 0.9302101135253906, 0.9327633380889893, 0.8073639273643494, 0.857752799987793, 0.9233083724975586, 0.9394725561141968, 0.9084609746932983, 0.8701782822608948, 0.9397266507148743, 0.8183448910713196, 0.894868016242981, 0.7693972587585449, 0.8867689967155457, 0.9226424098014832, 0.9201229214668274, 0.9249040484428406, 0.8193840384483337, 0.8946791291236877, 0.9223669767379761, 0.8545961976051331, 0.9245232939720154, 0.9336760640144348, 0.8631376624107361, 0.9156005382537842, 0.8420976996421814, 0.8654335141181946, 0.9161379933357239, 0.9053035974502563, 0.8874972462654114, 0.8864660263061523, 0.933313250541687, 0.92723149061203, 0.9353457093238831, 0.8306476473808289, 0.8791560530662537, 0.8119372129440308, 0.8999720215797424, 0.9442124962806702, 0.899267315864563, 0.9078536033630371, 0.8958151936531067, 0.9255598187446594, 0.9228153824806213, 0.9170296788215637, 0.9306989312171936, 0.917569637298584, 0.8361886143684387, 0.9063553214073181, 0.8904735445976257, 0.8699858784675598, 0.904773473739624, 0.8945385813713074, 0.9119576215744019, 0.937615692615509, 0.9303988814353943, 0.9040859341621399, 0.9130244851112366, 0.8878481388092041, 0.9118815064430237, 0.9475294351577759, 0.9476854801177979, 0.9858974814414978, 0.9135908484458923, 0.9229852557182312, 0.876125693321228, 0.9483741521835327, 0.9573747515678406, 0.9200234413146973, 0.9415658116340637, 0.8555031418800354, 0.8471717834472656, 0.7822481989860535, 0.86775141954422, 0.8380411863327026, 0.8851792216300964, 0.8616313338279724, 0.8462411165237427, 0.950431227684021, 0.9373284578323364, 0.8933728337287903, 0.8515669703483582, 0.902805745601654, 0.9336183667182922, 0.8932651281356812, 0.9206139445304871, 0.910638153553009, 0.9140180945396423, 0.7993201613426208, 0.9141210317611694, 0.9330586791038513, 0.9298518896102905, 0.9577697515487671, 0.8968740105628967, 0.9225027561187744, 0.8870011568069458, 0.8967422246932983, 0.9335638880729675, 0.8993678689002991, 0.9347009658813477, 0.8900122046470642, 0.9115005135536194, 0.9434510469436646, 0.8934614062309265, 0.876413106918335, 0.9270933270454407, 0.9160433411598206, 0.9382992386817932, 0.895605742931366, 0.9448871612548828, 0.9060046076774597, 0.8545349836349487, 0.8644903302192688, 0.9167739748954773, 0.9173679947853088, 0.9002652764320374, 0.896334707736969, 0.901555061340332, 0.9452206492424011, 0.9001531004905701, 0.9344832897186279, 0.8879255652427673, 0.8797474503517151, 0.957115113735199, 0.9090452194213867, 0.9319964051246643, 0.8883785605430603, 0.921256422996521, 0.8827820420265198, 0.9331145882606506, 0.9411246180534363, 0.8987269997596741, 0.9192599058151245, 0.8943833112716675, 0.8556774258613586, 0.911243200302124, 0.9549022316932678, 0.9033165574073792, 0.9359117150306702, 0.831298291683197, 0.9365508556365967, 0.903694212436676, 0.8926122784614563, 0.8979237675666809, 0.8974863886833191, 0.9091976284980774, 0.8927839398384094, 0.9033531546592712, 0.9046881198883057, 0.9044187664985657, 0.8954042792320251, 0.9223900437355042, 0.9411754608154297, 0.914362370967865, 0.8931801915168762, 0.8430816531181335, 0.8113706707954407, 0.8925990462303162, 0.9116106629371643, 0.9058759808540344, 0.8606383204460144, 0.9224939942359924, 0.904095470905304, 0.8918040990829468, 0.8705531358718872, 0.8733567595481873, 0.9132499098777771, 0.9233248233795166, 0.9260649681091309, 0.8642879724502563, 0.8896477222442627, 0.9023475050926208, 0.940700113773346, 0.9139788746833801, 0.9266456961631775, 0.8772727251052856, 0.9287435412406921, 0.9348581433296204, 0.9348583817481995, 0.9234512448310852, 0.8494803309440613, 0.873574435710907, 0.8998848795890808, 0.9169078469276428, 0.8740087151527405, 0.9084663391113281, 0.8683210015296936, 0.9204608201980591, 0.9498936533927917, 0.93422931432724, 0.9081950783729553, 0.9193372130393982, 0.915469765663147, 0.8683459162712097, 0.8758987784385681, 0.9076571464538574, 0.9214718341827393, 0.9505888819694519, 0.892458975315094, 0.9323503971099854, 0.8794094324111938, 0.8911378979682922, 0.9201993942260742, 0.9115894436836243, 0.8678500652313232, 0.8884047865867615, 0.9314274191856384, 0.855603039264679, 0.88689786195755, 0.8464680910110474, 0.9146779179573059, 0.8459892868995667, 0.8949527144432068, 0.832046389579773, 0.9262670874595642, 0.9201300740242004, 0.8885083794593811, 0.8943927884101868, 0.9155426621437073, 0.8988102674484253, 0.9040732979774475, 0.9022004008293152, 0.9142847061157227, 0.8597415089607239, 0.9687204360961914, 0.8642433285713196, 0.9044586420059204, 0.852767288684845, 0.8843305110931396, 0.8702683448791504, 0.8812292814254761, 0.8757131695747375, 0.8805707097053528, 0.9168539643287659, 0.928571879863739, 0.9525770545005798, 0.8772203922271729, 0.9100317358970642, 0.9039073586463928, 0.8826892375946045, 0.9157686829566956, 0.9297563433647156, 0.9189122915267944, 0.8552594780921936, 0.8964455127716064, 0.8627379536628723, 0.858587920665741, 0.8961638808250427, 0.9018470644950867, 0.9098995923995972, 0.9212899208068848, 0.9136266708374023, 0.9056594967842102, 0.8797689080238342, 0.8737958073616028, 0.9110929369926453, 0.8987742066383362, 0.9003037810325623, 0.8962239623069763, 0.8958097100257874, 0.7831641435623169, 0.7838719487190247, 0.914774477481842, 0.8870055675506592, 0.9391157031059265, 0.9676260948181152, 0.9063815474510193, 0.9055697917938232, 0.9045074582099915, 0.8552412390708923, 0.8437893986701965, 0.8945215344429016, 0.8193256855010986, 0.9128695130348206, 0.8446747660636902, 0.8972787857055664, 0.8606777191162109, 0.8680673241615295, 0.9254103302955627, 0.9413756728172302, 0.9170268177986145, 0.8557890057563782, 0.8403359055519104, 0.8997393250465393, 0.8522928953170776, 0.8725742101669312, 0.8090797066688538, 0.9357618689537048, 0.8777121901512146, 0.9067158699035645, 0.9276321530342102, 0.8964223265647888, 0.9093161225318909, 0.8688773512840271, 0.9136820435523987, 0.8700190782546997, 0.9184553027153015, 0.888344943523407, 0.9232524037361145, 0.8732969164848328, 0.9206710457801819, 0.9012330174446106, 0.8851527571678162, 0.8385122418403625, 0.9397475123405457, 0.8625929951667786, 0.9374735355377197, 0.862370491027832, 0.9255808591842651, 0.9195330739021301, 0.8975628018379211, 0.900586724281311, 0.893635630607605, 0.8621876239776611, 0.8732303380966187, 0.897526204586029, 0.8353964686393738, 0.8701059818267822, 0.893947422504425, 0.8986070156097412, 0.8740675449371338, 0.8629005551338196, 0.8020842671394348, 0.8605753779411316, 0.9095885753631592, 0.8095793128013611, 0.9287657141685486, 0.8750885128974915, 0.8519830107688904, 0.8995603919029236, 0.8450853228569031, 0.891198456287384, 0.9340034127235413, 0.8993993401527405, 0.9251180291175842, 0.8806260824203491, 0.9046375155448914, 0.9443597197532654, 0.9158884286880493, 0.8907002806663513, 0.934954047203064, 0.8800970315933228, 0.9037358164787292, 0.9037147164344788, 0.9221423864364624, 0.880710780620575, 0.8851271271705627, 0.8896451592445374, 0.8931620717048645, 0.9027139544487, 0.8096082806587219, 0.8919019103050232, 0.9071218967437744, 0.8965663313865662, 0.8987113833427429, 0.8294143676757812, 0.9057894349098206, 0.8743540644645691, 0.8894858956336975, 0.8992257118225098, 0.8526772856712341, 0.8863843083381653, 0.8687631487846375, 0.9048638343811035, 0.9172950983047485, 0.9265077710151672, 0.9563395977020264, 0.9268011450767517, 0.8846097588539124, 0.948378324508667, 0.9336844086647034, 0.9124924540519714, 0.8871123194694519, 0.9365206956863403, 0.8130536675453186, 0.8987528085708618, 0.8742997050285339, 0.8834622502326965, 0.8354790806770325, 0.9094838500022888, 0.8954048752784729, 0.9308664798736572, 0.8673753142356873, 0.9117258191108704, 0.9109363555908203, 0.9244206547737122, 0.8806682825088501, 0.9152957797050476, 0.8091570734977722, 0.7900033593177795, 0.9370889663696289, 0.8882244229316711, 0.9603486657142639, 0.8435665369033813, 0.8942090272903442, 0.8518694043159485, 0.8535180687904358, 0.8145318031311035, 0.9124785661697388, 0.8998295664787292, 0.6840411424636841, 0.9701802134513855, 0.8275913000106812, 0.9233065247535706, 0.8727084994316101, 0.7296933531761169, 0.9604958891868591, 0.8842697143554688, 0.8366385102272034, 0.8750563263893127, 0.9167400002479553, 0.8774985671043396, 0.9512060284614563, 0.9175886511802673, 0.9316598773002625, 0.8819899559020996, 0.8826863765716553, 0.756478488445282, 0.9158918261528015, 0.8752314448356628, 0.9341650009155273, 0.9094641804695129, 0.8989934325218201, 0.8839930295944214, 0.9092718958854675, 0.93215012550354, 0.9163044691085815, 0.8627046942710876, 0.9189165234565735, 0.8797246813774109, 0.8952374458312988, 0.8482808470726013, 0.9075455069541931, 0.937181830406189, 0.8535193800926208, 0.9020512700080872, 0.9557107090950012, 0.9200658202171326, 0.9098353981971741, 0.9111805558204651]}